http://www.komotv.com/news/health/7729407.html Americans divided on whether doctors should divided on whether doctors should AM PDT AM PDT NEW YORK (AP) - More than two-thirds of Americans believe there are circumstances in which a patient should be allowed to die, but they are closely divided on whether for a doctor to prescribing fatal drugs, a new AP-Ipsos poll finds. The results were released Tuesday, just days before Dr. Jack Kevorkian is freed from a Michigan prison after serving more than eight years for second-degree murder in the poisoning of a man with Lou Gehrig's disease. Kevorkian's defiant assisted suicide campaign, which he waged for years before his conviction, fueled nationwide debate about patients' right to die and the role that physicians should play. Though demonized by his critics as a callous killer, Kevorkian - who is to be released Friday - maintains relatively strong public support. The AP-Ipsos poll found that 53 percent of those surveyed thought he should not have been jailed; 40 percent supported his imprisonment. The results were similar to an ABC News poll in 1999 that found 55 percent disagreeing with his conviction. The new AP-Ipsos poll asked whether for doctors to prescribe lethal drugs to a practice currently allowed in Oregon but in no other states. Forty-eight percent said 44 percent said More broadly, 68 percent said there are circumstances when a patient should be allowed to die, while 30 percent said doctors and nurses, in all circumstances, should do everything possible to save the life of a patient. A majority of respondents - 55 percent - said they would not consider ending ill with a terminal disease. Thirty-five percent said they would consider that option. Oregon's physician-assisted suicide law took effect in 1997. Through last year, 292 people - mostly stricken with cancer - have died under its provisions, which allow terminally ill, mentally competent adults to administer life-ending medication prescribed by a physician. In addition to Oregon, three European countries - Switzerland, Belgium and the Netherlands - authorize assistance by doctors in the deaths of patients. Oregon's law has been reaffirmed by state voters and has survived intense legal challenges, but has yet to be emulated in any other state. Bills have been defeated by lawmakers in Vermont, Hawaii, Wisconsin and Washington; ballot measures to allow physician-assisted death have lost in Washington, California, Michigan and Maine. The current battleground is California, where a bill similar to Oregon's law is moving through the legislature. Even if it were to win final passage, there is uncertainty whether Gov. Arnold Schwarzenegger would sign it; he recently suggested the issue should go directly to voters as a ballot initiative. Assemblywoman Patty Berg, a co-author of the bill, said it gives a terminally ill patient "the power to chose the time, place and circumstances of their death." She contended that most Californians support the measure, but that it faces tough opposition from the Roman Catholic Church, some conservative Protestant churches, and the California Medical Association. "Physicians look at it as the ultimate abandonment of a patient," said medical association spokesman Ron Lopp. "That's not the physician's role, to aggressively hasten death." The AP-Ipsos poll showed that religious faith is a significant factor in views on the subject. Only 34 percent of those who attend religious services at least once a week think for doctors to their own lives. In contrast, 70 percent of those who never attend religious services thought the practice should be legal. Just 23 percent of those who attend religious services at least weekly would consider ending terminally ill, compared to 49 percent of those who never attend religious services. There also was a divide along partisan lines, with 57 percent of Democrats saying for doctors to to 39 percent of Republicans. Similarly, 56 percent of Republicans felt Kevorkian should have been jailed, compared to 31 percent of Democrats. Men were more likely to say they would consider ending faced with a terminal illness - 43 percent of men would consider the option, compared to just 28 percent of women. And 53 percent of men think for doctors to help end the lives of terminally ill patients, compared to 44 percent of women. Southerners and Midwesterners are most likely to oppose assisted suicide. The poll found that 59 percent of Northeasterners feel the practice should be legal, compared with 52 percent in the West, 45 percent in the Midwest, and 43 percent in the South. The AP-Ipsos poll involved telephone interviews with 1,000 randomly chosen adults from May 22-24. The margin of sampling error was plus or minus 3 percentage points.
http://www.komotv.com/news/health/7730092.html New fitness vibration plates popular but may be risky, experts say fitness vibration plates popular but may be risky, experts say Trainer Michela Rossi demonstrates an exercise on a Power Plate fitness machine for Amy at the Power Plate Institute in Chicago. PM PDT PM PDT CHICAGO (AP) - What if you could burn fat while shaking a martini? Actually, it's your body that shakes like a martini on a new type of fitness machine that's generating lots of buzz and celebrity use. Even NASA has tested the concept. These machines use vibrations to tone muscle and claim to do it faster. Aggressive promoters also say the equipment improves flexibility and strength, reduces pain and stress, builds muscle and reverses osteoporosis. However, researchers warn of possible injuries ranging from back pain to cartilage damage. One even warns that the high-powered jiggling might harm the brain. They say the science is thin and too little is known about the long-term effects of such powerful vibrations. Still, NASA is studying vibration as a possible tool for reducing muscle atrophy and bone loss during astronauts' long, weightless trips in space. And users of the equipment love the sensation and the quick workout. Workout times are reduced by two-thirds, advocates say, a claim that appeals to busy professionals, mothers of young children and just about anyone who shuns exercise. "I feel kind of tingly and a little like I got off a ship, kind of shaky but in a good way," said Amy Allen, a 40-year-old working mom in Chicago, after a 25-minute workout on the Power Plate, one of the higher-end brands. "I'm hoping this is the solution to help me get that extra weight off." The Power Plate vibrates 20 to 50 times a second in three directions, increasing g-forces on the body, and according to the Northbrook, Ill.-based company of the same name. The company says that raises the effectiveness of lunges, squats and other exercises done while standing on it. The workout is not aerobic; it's more like weightlifting without weights. "You don't really feel like you're working that hard, but then you get that sweat going and once the vibration stops, you can really feel it in your legs or upper body," said Michaela Zakheim, 45, who uses the machine at a fitness center in her Lincoln Park neighborhood. Power Plate sells models for home and gym at prices ranging from $3,000 to $10,500. Motors in the base make a low humming noise. Controls adjust the duration and intensity. The machines weigh 264 to 500 pounds and have handles to hang onto. Fitness trainers love them, but some users don't like the fact they can't read or watch TV while working out on them, said Craig Bradley, general manager of Holmes Place, an upscale Chicago health club that has four Power Plates. Doubts also stem from memories of the belt vibrators popular 50 years ago. Others have been won over though. "I think the machines are as good as the imagination of the person using them," Bradley said. Dozens of companies have entered the market, including Soloflex which has sold more than 30,000 of its $295 vibrating, skateboard-like, handle-free platforms in less than three years, said Jerry Wilson, the Hillsboro, Ore.-based company's CEO and founder. "We get reports back that it helps people with incontinence," Wilson said. "Their aches and pains have gone away. They're stronger. They sleep better. It has basically the same effects as if they'd started an exercise program." A study at NASA's Johnson Space Center showed that the use of a vibration platform during exercise squats made muscles work more, but it didn't look at whether vibration makes athletes run faster or jump higher. "Vibration works ... but we're still trying to figure out how to use it best and I think we're a number of years away before we do that," said Bill Amonette, one of the study authors and a fitness expert at the University of Houston-Clear Lake. "I think we have to be cautious of some of the claims. ... With aggressive marketing, sometimes they claim things that aren't necessarily true." Some researchers are also concerned that high-amplitude vibration can be dangerous over time since it can send jarring waves throughout the body, said Andrew Abercromby, another researcher at Johnson Space Center. "I believe, and I think quite a few other people believe, the jury is still out on it," Abercromby said. Clinton Rubin, a biomedical engineering professor at State University of New York at Stony Brook, said he has asked Power Plate to stop citing his research in its promotional materials. His work has led to a vibration device before the Food and Drug Administration approval for prevention and reversal of bone loss from osteoporosis, but that device uses much gentler vibrations than Power Plate, Rubin said. He believes the Power Plate's vibration levels could cause low back pain, cartilage damage, blurred vision, hearing loss and even brain damage. "I think they are cavalier in dismissing the dangers of chronic exposure," he said. "I'm a scientist. I worry that people are going to use this device based on a misrepresentation of science." Power Plate warns pregnant women and people with retinal detachment, blood clots, bone tumors and other medical conditions not to use the machines. Soloflex recommends using its device only 30 minutes a day because too much use would exceed industry standards for safe vibrations in the workplace. (The Occupational Safety and Health Administration doesn't set safety levels for fitness equipment, an agency spokesman said.) "I own a steel factory so I know whole body vibration has allowable exposure limits," Wilson said. "But too much aspirin is bad for one too."
http://www.komotv.com/news/health/7730187.html Govt. quarantines man with dangerous case of TB quarantines man with dangerous case of TB PM PDT PM PDT ATLANTA (AP) - A man with a rare and dangerous form of tuberculosis ignored doctors' advice and took two trans-Atlantic flights, leading to the first U.S. government-ordered quarantine since 1963, health officials said Tuesday. The man, who officials did not identify, is at Atlanta's Grady Memorial Hospital in respiratory isolation. He was potentially infectious at the time of the flights, so officials at the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention recommended medical exams for cabin crew members on those flights, as well as passengers sitting in the same rows or within two rows. CDC officials did not release row numbers but said the airlines were working with health officials to contact those passengers. Passengers who should be tested will be contacted by health officials from their home countries. The infected man flew from Atlanta to Paris on May 12 aboard Air France Flight 385. He returned to North America on May 24 aboard Czech Air Flight 0104 from Prague to Montreal. The man then drove into the United States at the Champlain, N.Y., border crossing. The man told health officials he was not coughing during the flights. Tests indicated the amount of TB bacteria in him was low, so passengers are not considered to be at high risk of infection, said Dr. Martin Cetron, director of the CDC's division of global migration and quarantine. The man had been told by health officials in early May that he had a form of TB that was resistant to first-line antibiotics and was advised not to travel to Europe. "He was told traveling is against medical advice," said Dr. Steven Katkowsky, director of the Fulton County Department of Health & Wellness. Health officials said they don't know how the Georgia man was infected. The government issued the quarantine after a CDC official reached the man by phone in Rome and told him not to take commercial flights, but he flew back to North America anyway. "He was told in no uncertain terms not to take a flight back," Cetron said. Cetron reached the man once he was back in the United States. At that point, he voluntarily went to a New York hospital, then was flown by the CDC to the Atlanta hospital. He is not facing prosecution, health officials said. The quarantine order was the first since 1963, when the government quarantined a patient with smallpox, according to the CDC. The man, who went on the trip with his wife, also traveled within Europe, but CDC officials said they did not have information to release about whether the trips were by plane, train or other public transportation. His wife tested negative for TB before the trip and is not considered a public health risk, health officials said. CDC officials said they are concentrating on investigating the trans-Atlantic flights, when possibility of spread of the disease was greatest because he was in a confined space with other people for many hours. Tuberculosis is a disease caused by germs that are spread from person to person through the air. It usually affects the lungs and can lead to symptoms such as chest pain and coughing up blood. It kills nearly 2 million people each year worldwide. Because of antibiotics and other measures, the TB rate in the United States has been falling for years. Last year, it hit an all-time low of 13,767 cases, or about 4.6 cases per 100,000 Americans. Health officials worry about "multidrug-resistant" TB, which can withstand the mainline antibiotics isoniazid and rifampin. The man was infected with something even worse - "extensively drug-resistant" TB, also called XDR-TB, which resists many drugs used to treat the infection. There have been 17 U.S. XDR-TB cases since 2000, according to CDC statistics. Three-quarters were people from foreign countries. One case was a Russian man who arrived in Phoenix last year. He was jailed after he stopped taking medications and went unmasked to a restaurant and other businesses, threatening the health of others. The CDC's statement that the patient is at the low end of communicability "provides some reassurance," said Dr. William Schaffner, chairman of the department of preventive medicine at Vanderbilt University. The highly dangerous form is "expanding around the world," particularly in South Africa, eastern Europe and the former states of the Soviet Union, he said.
http://www.komotv.com/news/health ill woman to donate kidney on reality show A Dutch reality show that claims to be trying to draw attention to a shortage of organ donors go ahead with a program in which a terminally ill woman will choose a contestant to receive one of her kidneys. CDC looking for 80 passengers, 27 crew from TB flights A man with a form of tuberculosis so dangerous he is under the first U.S. government-ordered quarantine since 1963 had health officials around the world scrambling Wednesday to find about 80 passengers who sat within five rows of him on two trans-Atlantic flights. US on mad cow: Don't test all cattle The Bush administration fight to keep meatpackers from testing all their animals for mad cow disease. New UN testing guidance aims to identify more people with HIV Health agency warns water-pipe smoking may pose same risk as cigarettes Advanced Medical says that contact lens solution recall not due to manufacturing problem Govt. quarantines man with dangerous case of TB New fitness vibration plates popular but may be risky, experts say Americans divided on whether doctors should FDA says warning shouldn't interrupt MedImmune flu vaccine production Antibodies from bird flu survivors point to new therapy Poke holes in a lung? Research aims to ease breath-robbing disease As ultrasound machines shrink, patients worldwide reap the benefits Fitness boot camps hit the parks, offering workouts beyond the gym Army to teach soldiers combat lifesaving during basic training Triple amputee to graduate from UCLA medical school 6 medical workers convicted in HIV case in Libya found not guilty of defamation On eve of Kevorkian's release, only Oregon has assisted suicide law CDC: Brand of contact lens solution linked to rare eye infection FDA acts against unapproved long-acting cough and cold drugs Study: Type 1 diabetic kids who watched lots of TV had poor control of disease Between-meal snacks can be a good thing for the elderly 75% of U.S. households forbid smoking, study finds FDA blocks imports of Chinese toothpaste to test for deadly chemical New study calls for FDA to regulate tobacco, require lower nicotine levels Government to study best treatment of life-threatening child seizures Free cervical cancer vaccine arriving in Washington state Study suggests way to save more premature infants In marketing weight loss pill, drugmaker touts diet and exercise Birth-control pill that eliminates women's periods wins FDA approval Advanced trials planned for new Alzheimer's drug Diabetes drug Avandia raises the risk of heart attacks, study suggests States balk at bills to require cancer vaccine for preteen girls sparks chaos with reckless U-turns
http://www.komotv.com/news/health/7749147.html CDC looking for 80 passengers, 27 crew from TB flights looking for 80 passengers, 27 crew from TB flights PM PDT PM PDT ATLANTA (AP) - A man with a form of tuberculosis so dangerous he is under the first U.S. government-ordered quarantine since 1963 had health officials around the world scrambling Wednesday to find about 80 passengers who sat within five rows of him on two trans-Atlantic flights. The man told a newspaper he took the first flight from Atlanta to Europe for his wedding, then the second flight home because he feared he might die without treatment in the U.S. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention Director Julie Gerberding said Wednesday that the CDC is working closely with airlines to find passengers who may have been exposed to the rare, dangerous strain. Health officials in France said they have asked Air France-KLM for passenger lists, and the Italian Health Ministry said it is tracing the man's movements. "Is the patient himself highly infectious? Fortunately, in this case, he's probably not," Gerberding said. "But the other piece is this bacteria is a very deadly bacteria. We just have to err on the side of caution." Dr. Martin Cetron, director of the CDC's division of global migration and quarantine, said Wednesday that the agency was trying to contact 27 crew members from the two flights for testing and about 80 passengers who sat in the five rows surrounding the man. About 40 or 50 of those people sat in or near Row 51 on the Air France flight from Atlanta to Paris, and about 30 passengers were in or near seat 12C on the second flight, from Prague to Montreal. Health officials said the man had been advised not to fly and knew he could expose others when he boarded the jets. The man, however, told The Atlanta Journal-Constitution that doctors didn't order him not to fly and only suggested he put off his long-planned wedding in Greece. He knew he had a form of tuberculosis and that it was resistant to first-line drugs, but he didn't realize until he was already in Europe that it could be so dangerous, he said. "We headed off to Greece thinking everything's fine," said the man, who declined to be identified because of the stigma attached to his diagnosis. He flew to Paris on May 12 aboard Air France Flight 385, also listed as Delta Air Lines codeshare Flight 8517. While he was in Europe, health authorities reached him with the news that further tests had revealed his TB was a rare, "extensively drug-resistant" form, far more dangerous than he knew. They ordered him into isolation, saying he should turn himself over to Italian officials. Instead, the man flew from Prague to Montreal on May 24 aboard Czech Air Flight 0104, then drove into the United States at Champlain, N.Y. He told the newspaper he was afraid that if he didn't get back to the U.S., he wouldn't get the treatment he needed to survive. He is now at Atlanta's Grady Memorial Hospital in respiratory isolation. A spokesman for Denver's National Jewish Hospital, which specializes in respiratory disorders, said Wednesday that the man would be treated there. It was not clear when he would arrive, spokesman William Allstetter said. "The patient continues to feel well and be asymptomatic. He's currently still in isolation," Cetron said Wednesday. Citing privacy concerns, he said the CDC "cannot and won't talk further about this patient." The other passengers on the flights are not considered at high risk of infection because tests indicated the amount of TB bacteria in the man was low, Cetron said. But Gerberding noted that U.S. health officials have had little experience with this type of TB. It's possible it may have different transmission patterns, she said. "We're thankful the patient was not in a highly infectious state, but we know the risk of transmission isn't zero, even with the fact that he didn't have symptoms and didn't appear to be coughing," Gerberding said on ABC's "Good Morning America." "We've got to really look at the people closest to him, get them skin tested." Dr. Howard Njoo of the Public Health Agency of Canada said it appeared unlikely that the man spread the disease on the flight into Canada. Still the agency was working with U.S. officials to contact passengers who sat near him. Daniela Hupakova, a spokeswoman for the Czech airline CSA, said the flight crew underwent medical checks and are fine. The airline was contacting passengers and cooperating with Czech and foreign authorities, she said. Health officials in France have asked Air France-KLM to provide lists of passengers seated within two rows of the man, an airline spokeswoman said on condition of anonymity according to company policy. The man told the Journal-Constitution he was in Rome during his honeymoon when the CDC notified him of the new tests and told him to turn himself in to Italian authorities to be isolated and be treated. The CDC told him he couldn't fly aboard commercial airliners. "I thought to myself: You're nuts. I wasn't going to do that. They told me I had been put on the no-fly list and my passport was flagged," the man said. He told the newspaper he and his wife decided to sneak back into the U.S. through Canada. He said he voluntarily went to a New York hospital, then was flown by the CDC to Atlanta. He is not facing prosecution, health officials said. "I'm a very well-educated, successful, intelligent person," he told the paper. "This is insane to me that I have an armed guard outside my door when I've cooperated with everything other than the whole solitary-confinement-in-Italy thing." CDC officials told The Associated Press they could not immediately comment on the interview. Health officials said the man's wife tested negative for TB before the trip and is not considered a public health risk. They said they don't know how the Georgia man was infected. The quarantine order was the first since the government quarantined a patient with smallpox in 1963, according to the CDC. Tuberculosis is caused by germs that are spread from person to person through the air. It usually affects the lungs and can lead to symptoms such as chest pain and coughing up blood. It kills nearly 2 million people each year worldwide. Because of antibiotics and other measures, the TB rate in the United States has been falling for years. Last year, it hit an all-time low of 13,767 cases, or about 4.6 cases per 100,000 Americans. Health officials worry about "multidrug-resistant" TB, which can withstand the mainline antibiotics isoniazid and rifampin. The man was infected with something even worse - "extensively drug-resistant" TB, also called XDR-TB, which resists many drugs used to treat the infection. There have been 17 U.S. XDR-TB cases since 2000, according to CDC statistics.
http://www.komotv.com/news/health/7726402.html FDA says warning shouldn't interrupt MedImmune flu vaccine production says warning shouldn't interrupt MedImmune flu vaccine production AM PDT AM PDT WASHINGTON (AP) - A warning issued to MedImmune Inc. over manufacturing issues at a United Kingdom plant shouldn't significantly disrupt company production of its nasal spray flu vaccine, federal health officials said Tuesday. The Gaithersburg, Md., company disclosed last week the Food and Drug Administration had issued the warning for deviating from standard practices in its manufacturing of bulk lots of its FluMist vaccine. MedImmune and the FDA both said they were trying to resolve the issue, which involved bacteria and mold contamination at a very early stage of vaccine production. The contamination did not affect finished lots of the vaccine, the FDA said. The warning means the FDA is delaying approving FluMist for use in children as young as 1 until MedImmune develops a plan and begins to take corrective action. FluMist already is approved for patients 5 to 49. In 2004, the nation's flu-shot supply was abruptly cut in half when British regulators shut down a Chiron Corp. factory because of contamination concerns. FDA stressed its concerns with MedImmune do not rise to that level. "It is different from Chiron in that again, we do not have a product failure at this point," Mary Malarkey, director of compliance and biologics quality in the FDA office that oversees vaccines, told reporters.
http://www.komotv.com/news/health/7747827.html US on mad cow: Don't test all cattle on mad cow: Don't test all cattle AM PDT AM PDT WASHINGTON (AP) - The Bush administration fight to keep meatpackers from testing all their animals for mad cow disease. The Agriculture Department tests less than 1 percent of slaughtered cows for the disease, which can be fatal to humans who eat tainted beef. But Kansas-based Creekstone Farms Premium Beef wants to test all of its cows. Larger meat companies feared that move because, if Creekstone tested its meat and advertised it as safe, they might have to perform the expensive test, too. The Agriculture Department regulates the test and argued that widespread testing could lead to a false positive that would harm the meat industry. A federal judge ruled in March that such tests must be allowed. U.S. District Judge James Robertson noted that Creekstone sought to use the same test the government relies on and said the government didn't have the authority to restrict it. The ruling was to take effect June 1, but the Agriculture Department appeal - effectively delaying the testing until the court challenge plays out. Mad cow disease, or bovine spongiform encephalopathy, is linked to more than 150 human deaths worldwide, mostly in Britain. There have been three cases of mad cow disease in the U.S. The first, in December 2003 in Washington state, was in a cow that had been imported from Canada. The second, in 2005, was in a Texas-born cow. The third was confirmed last year in an Alabama cow.
http://www.komotv.com/news/health/7747757.html New UN testing guidance aims to identify more people with HIV UN testing guidance aims to identify more people with HIV AM PDT AM PDT LONDON (AP) - Health professionals should routinely offer to test people for HIV instead of waiting for patients to request it, according to new advice from the United Nations Wednesday. In making the recommendations, the World Health Organization and UNAIDS are underlining the need to identify the millions worldwide who need treatment. WHO estimates that approximately 80 percent of HIV-positive people in developing countries are currently unaware of their status. "If we are serious about ensuring universal access to drugs, there has to be a fundamental change in the approach to HIV testing," said Dr. Kevin De Cock, director of WHO's AIDS department. The UN now advises health workers to test patients for HIV as part of standard medical care, but only with the patient's informed consent. Yet there are questions about how the cash-strapped countries in Africa might adopt these guidelines. Of the estimated 40 million people living worldwide with HIV/AIDS, nearly 65 percent are in Africa. Because current estimates of the number of HIV/AIDS patients include people who don't know their status, experts do not expect the numbers to rise dramatically if more people are tested. Though universal testing will certainly identify more HIV-positive people needing lifesaving anti-retrovirals, there is already a long waiting list: Nearly 5 million people in sub-Saharan Africa are still without treatment. Identifying more AIDS patients whom countries cannot afford to treat threatens to create an even bigger backlog of people who know they are sick, but have no access to care. Most AIDS experts believe that increased HIV testing will help, even if the conditions are not perfect. "No one wants a situation where people find out they're HIV-positive and can't get anti-retroviral treatment," said Jennifer Kates, vice president and director of HIV policy for the Kaiser Family Foundation. "But if we waited until everything was perfectly aligned, we would never respond." Another benefit of testing: Past studies also have shown that once people are aware that they are HIV-positive, they tend to practice safer sex - which could give prevention efforts a boost. Africa's weak health infrastructure, though, is a huge stumbling block. The continent urgently needs at least another 4 million health workers to fill the gap, according to WHO. Without doctors and nurses to administer the HIV tests or to provide the necessary treatment when patients are identified, such guidance will create even more stress for Africa's already fragile health systems. Still, the new testing procedures should mean that HIV patients are found earlier. "The biggest problem we have now is that our health care systems are overburdened with very sick people who come in too late," said Zackie Achmat, chairman of South Africa's Treatment Action Campaign. "These new guidelines are long overdue," said Achmat. "We cannot deal with the burden on the health care service if we don't prevent people from becoming so sick that they become a supreme burden on it," he said. Increased HIV testing and the treatment and infrastructure it ultimately entails will require more money, yet no new funds have been announced to help countries implement these policies. The UN estimates that the fight against AIDS in 2007-2008 requires $22 billion, and there is still a considerable shortfall. Last year, the deficit for global AIDS programs was about $6 billion. While health authorities would like to see the new UN recommendations adopted much will depend on whether countries decide to follow their advice. "I hope that countries start implementing this immediately," said WHO's De Cock. "But we know you can't just flip the switch and change everything in one day."
http://www.komotv.com/news/health/7747747.html Health agency warns water-pipe smoking may pose same risk as cigarettes agency warns water-pipe smoking may pose same risk as cigarettes AM PDT AM PDT GENEVA (AP) - Smoking from a water pipe may pose the same health risks as cigarettes, the World Health Organization said Tuesday, adding that there's a need for more research into the link between hookahs and a number of fatal illnesses. The hookah, used for centuries in North Africa, the Middle East and Central and South Asia, has become increasingly popular in the West, particularly among college students and young adults. Hookah bars have sprung up in cities across the United States, and groups of people often visit them to relax and talk while smoking from the water pipes. WHO, however, warned that using the water pipe to smoke tobacco is "not a safe alternative to cigarette smoking." In a seven-page document on the practice, the U.N. health agency said the rising popularity of hookahs is partly due to "unfounded assumptions" of safety and misleading commercial marketing. "Contrary to ancient lore and popular belief, the smoke that emerges from a water pipe contains numerous toxicants known to cause lung cancer, heart disease and other diseases," said WHO, which also issued a 50-page report Tuesday urging all countries to ban smoking in public buildings. WHO warned that using water pipes to consume shisha - a mixture of tobacco, molasses and fruit flavors - usually exposes a person to more smoke over a longer period of time than do cigarettes. The health agency said a person can inhale more than 100 times more smoke in a hookah session than in a single cigarette. By delivering nicotine, the water pipe can cause addiction. Preliminary research also indicates that hookah smoking may involve "some unique health risks," WHO said. A hookah typically consists of a bowl connected to a vase of water with a long tube and mouthpiece. The tobacco sits inside the bowl with a layer of foil and a hot coal on top. The shisha is not lit, instead heated by the charcoal, which users say produces a vapor different from smoke. "None of the accessories have been demonstrated to reduce smokers' exposure to toxins or risk of tobacco-related disease and death," WHO said. While further research is required, the health body said those exposed to secondhand hookah smoke appeared to be at risk of the same diseases as those exposed to cigarettes. WHO warned that hookah smoke could also increase the risk of adverse effects during pregnancy. Also Tuesday, WHO issued its strongest policy recommendations yet for controlling tobacco use, urging all countries to ban smoking at indoor workplaces and in public buildings. Tobacco use is the world's leading cause of preventable death, accounting for 10 percent of adult fatalities, according to WHO. It is responsible for 5.4 million deaths each year, a figure that is expected to rise to 8.3 million by 2030, the agency says. Increasing numbers of nonsmokers will also die unless governments take action, WHO said. It said governments of both rich and poor countries should declare all public indoor places smoke-free, by passing laws and actively enforcing measures to ensure that "everyone has a right to breathe clean air, free from tobacco smoke."
http://www.komotv.com/news/health/7735622.html Advanced Medical says that contact lens solution recall not due to manufacturing problem Medical says that contact lens solution recall not due to manufacturing problem PM PDT PM PDT ATLANTA (AP) - The company involved in a voluntary recall of a contact lens solution by its product and blamed improper handling of contact lenses for the eye infections that forced the product to be pulled from the shelves. "What we're trying to handle right now ... is what the CDC hit us with," said James Mazzo, president and chief executive officer of Santa Ana, Calif.-based Advanced Medical Optics Inc., in a Tuesday morning conference call. Government officials Friday warned people to throw away AMO Complete Moisture Plus Multi-Purpose Solution, using for cleaning and storing soft contact lenses, after an investigation linked it to a rare eye infection. The solution seems to be a factor in cases of Acanthamoeba keratitis, a painful eye infection caused by a waterborne organism that, untreated, can lead to permanent vision loss or blindness, the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention said. "It's not a manufacturing problem or a contamination issue," said Mazzo, who added that the infection, also called "AK," affects people who improperly handle contact lenses, such as disinfecting them with water or wearing them while swimming or showering. "AK is something the vast majority of contact lens users typically avoid by following their eye practitioner's advice," Mazzo said. "All of our products ... have always met and continue to meet FDA requirements. Moisture Plus does what it is required to do." CDC officials said they drew a link between the Advanced Medical Optics product and the infection because 58 percent of confirmed cases who wore soft contact lenses had used the solution in the month before onset of symptoms, and 39 percent had used only that solution. They calculated that wearers of soft contact lenses who had the infection were at least seven times more likely to have used AMO Complete Moisture Plus than healthy people who wear soft contact lenses. It's generally difficult to draw a strong statistical conclusion from a small number of cases, but in this case an association between the product and the infection was clear-cut, CDC officials said. Health officials will continue to investigate why the association exists. But in the interest of public health, they decided a warning was necessary, said Dr. Sharon Roy, the CDC epidemiologist who led the investigation. Chief Financial Officer Randy Meier said that the Moisture Plus products' $105.7 million in 2006 sales represent about 10 percent of the company's total consolidated sales. "We're still working through the details to determine how much of that revenue will be impacted by the recall," Meier said. "It is impossible to assess what path we'll take or what the impact will be to our future earnings." Meier said the company will update investors early next week. "While this recall is clearly a setback for our eye care business, none of our other products will be affected," Meier said. Shares of Advanced Medical Optics fell 13.7 percent to $34.69 Tuesday. The CDC and the U.S. Food and Drug Administration are investigating 138 confirmed cases since January 2005. CDC officials said people should discard the solution, throw out their current contact lenses and toss away the lens storage case. All of them may harbor the infecting amoeba, said Michael Beach, team leader in the CDC's division of parasitic diseases. An estimated 85 percent of U.S. cases of Acanthamoeba keratitis occur in contact lens users, but it's extremely rare. The estimated prevalence is one to two cases per 1 million contact lens wearers. Contact lens wearers who practice proper lens care and people who don't wear contact lenses can still develop the infection. CDC information on Acanthamoeba
http://www.komotv.com/news/health/7756472.html Terminally ill woman to donate kidney on reality show ill woman to donate kidney on reality show PM PDT PM PDT By TOBY STERLING Associated Press Writer AMSTERDAM, Netherlands (AP) - A Dutch reality show that claims to be trying to draw attention to a shortage of organ donors go ahead with a program in which a terminally ill woman will choose a contestant to receive one of her kidneys. The program, ''Big Donor Show,'' has been attacked as unethical and tasteless. One member of the Dutch parliament suggested the government should block Friday's broadcast. ''We know that this program is super controversial and some people will think it's tasteless, but we think the reality is even more shocking and tasteless: waiting for an organ is just like playing the lottery,'' Laurens Drillich, chairman of the BNN network, said in a statement. He said waiting lists in the Netherlands are more than four years long and 200 patients die annually for lack of a donor. The network identified the donor as ''Lisa,'' a 37-year-old woman with an inoperable brain tumor. During the show, she will hear interviews with the three candidates, their families and friends before choosing who will get her kidney. The show is being produced by Endemol NV, the creator of the ''Big Brother'' series. A spokeswoman for BNN said that there could be no guarantees the donation would actually be made, ''but the intention is'' Lisa's donation would be carried out before she died. That is because her wish to donate to a particular candidate ''wouldn't be valid anymore after her death'' under Dutch donation rules, Marieke Saly said. If Lisa does donate one kidney while living, the other kidney may still be awarded to someone else on a national donation waiting list under the country's organ allotment system. Viewers will be able to vote for the candidate they feel is most deserving via SMS text message, but ''Lisa will determine who the happy one is,'' BNN said in a statement. Saly could not say how much it will cost to send an SMS, but most TV programs charge around $1.35. Joop Atsma, a lawmaker of the ruling Christian Democrats, raised the issue in parliament, asking the government whether the program violated any law. ''Is it desirable that public broadcasting would go down this path, and is there no way to send a strong signal that we reject this?'' he said. Education Minister Ronald Plasterk, addressing parliament on behalf of the government because the health minister was ill, replied that there were serious questions about whether the transplant would actually go through as BNN has advertised it - but that there was no way to stop the program from airing. ''The information I have right now tells me that the program is unfitting and unethical, especially due to the competitive element, but it's up to program makers to make their choices,'' he said. ''The constitution forbids me from interfering in the content of programs: let there be no mistake about that, that would be censorship.'' He said that there were practical barriers. ''In every transplant the tissue of the donor and the patient must match as much as possible,'' Plasterk said. ''The doctors in this program can't make any concessions on that front.'' There also was doubt whether Lisa's organs could be donated at all because it might spread her cancer, he said. ''So it's very possible that in practical terms we're not talking about anything here, because it's possible this transplant can't take place,'' he said. Noting the shortage of donors, he said it was a good time for a debate on the question of what incentives to donate are ethical. He cited the example of a Dutch funeral home that is offering discounts to the families of people who were registered as donors, and an idea presented by the country's Kidney Institute to give registered donors preference on organ waiting lists. Copyright 2007 The Associated Press. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed.
http://www.komotv.com/news/health/7729407.html Americans divided on whether doctors should help terminally ill patients die divided on whether doctors should help terminally ill patients die May 29, 2007 at 11:30 AM PDT May 29, 2007 at 11:30 AM PDT NEW YORK (AP) - More than two-thirds of Americans believe there are circumstances in which a patient should be allowed to die, but they are closely divided on whether it should be legal for a doctor to help terminally ill patients end prescribing fatal drugs, a new AP-Ipsos poll finds. The results were released Tuesday, just days before Dr. Jack Kevorkian is freed from a Michigan prison after serving more than eight years for second-degree murder in the poisoning of a man with Lou Gehrig's disease. Kevorkian's defiant assisted suicide campaign, which he waged for years before his conviction, fueled nationwide debate about patients' right to die and the role that physicians should play. Though demonized by his critics as a callous killer, Kevorkian - who is to be released Friday - maintains relatively strong public support. The AP-Ipsos poll found that 53 percent of those surveyed thought he should not have been jailed; 40 percent supported his imprisonment. The results were similar to an ABC News poll in 1999 that found 55 percent disagreeing with his conviction. The new AP-Ipsos poll asked whether it should be legal for doctors to prescribe lethal drugs to help terminally ill patients end a practice currently allowed in Oregon but in no other states. Forty-eight percent said it should be legal; 44 percent said it should be illegal. More broadly, 68 percent said there are circumstances when a patient should be allowed to die, while 30 percent said doctors and nurses, in all circumstances, should do everything possible to save the life of a patient. A majority of respondents - 55 percent - said they would not consider ending ill with a terminal disease. Thirty-five percent said they would consider that option. Oregon's physician-assisted suicide law took effect in 1997. Through last year, 292 people - mostly stricken with cancer - have died under its provisions, which allow terminally ill, mentally competent adults to administer life-ending medication prescribed by a physician. In addition to Oregon, three European countries - Switzerland, Belgium and the Netherlands - authorize assistance by doctors in the deaths of patients. Oregon's law has been reaffirmed by state voters and has survived intense legal challenges, but has yet to be emulated in any other state. Bills have been defeated by lawmakers in Vermont, Hawaii, Wisconsin and Washington; ballot measures to allow physician-assisted death have lost in Washington, California, Michigan and Maine. The current battleground is California, where a bill similar to Oregon's law is moving through the legislature. Even if it were to win final passage, there is uncertainty whether Gov. Arnold Schwarzenegger would sign it; he recently suggested the issue should go directly to voters as a ballot initiative. Assemblywoman Patty Berg, a co-author of the bill, said it gives a terminally ill patient "the power to chose the time, place and circumstances of their death." She contended that most Californians support the measure, but that it faces tough opposition from the Roman Catholic Church, some conservative Protestant churches, and the California Medical Association. "Physicians look at it as the ultimate abandonment of a patient," said medical association spokesman Ron Lopp. "That's not the physician's role, to aggressively hasten death." The AP-Ipsos poll showed that religious faith is a significant factor in views on the subject. Only 34 percent of those who attend religious services at least once a week think it should be legal for doctors to help terminally ill patients end their own lives. In contrast, 70 percent of those who never attend religious services thought the practice should be legal. Just 23 percent of those who attend religious services at least weekly would consider ending terminally ill, compared to 49 percent of those who never attend religious services. There also was a divide along partisan lines, with 57 percent of Democrats saying it should be legal for doctors to help terminally ill patients end to 39 percent of Republicans. Similarly, 56 percent of Republicans felt Kevorkian should have been jailed, compared to 31 percent of Democrats. Men were more likely to say they would consider ending faced with a terminal illness - 43 percent of men would consider the option, compared to just 28 percent of women. And 53 percent of men think it should be legal for doctors to help end the lives of terminally ill patients, compared to 44 percent of women. Southerners and Midwesterners are most likely to oppose assisted suicide. The poll found that 59 percent of Northeasterners feel the practice should be legal, compared with 52 percent in the West, 45 percent in the Midwest, and 43 percent in the South. The AP-Ipsos poll involved telephone interviews with 1,000 randomly chosen adults from May 22-24. The margin of sampling error was plus or minus 3 percentage points. Baby sitter accused of raping baby boy The Schrammie: Michael Schreck, time to fess up Two dead in Eatonville crash Police: 'Missing' naval officer not missing Microsoft shows off 'coffee table of the future' Ken Schram: I'm sorry School evacuated after plumber finds body in air conditioning duct Miss USA booed at Miss Universe pageant Rosie O'Donnell says she may never speak to Elisabeth Hasselbeck again 'King of spam' arrested in Seattle
http://www.komotv.com/news/health/7730092.html New fitness vibration plates popular but may be risky, experts say fitness vibration plates popular but may be risky, experts say Trainer Michela Rossi demonstrates an exercise on a Power Plate fitness machine for Amy at the Power Plate Institute in Chicago. May 29, 2007 at 12:15 PM PDT May 29, 2007 at 12:15 PM PDT CHICAGO (AP) - What if you could burn fat while shaking a martini? Actually, it's your body that shakes like a martini on a new type of fitness machine that's generating lots of buzz and celebrity use. Even NASA has tested the concept. These machines use vibrations to tone muscle and claim to do it faster. Aggressive promoters also say the equipment improves flexibility and strength, reduces pain and stress, builds muscle and reverses osteoporosis. However, researchers warn of possible injuries ranging from back pain to cartilage damage. One even warns that the high-powered jiggling might harm the brain. They say the science is thin and too little is known about the long-term effects of such powerful vibrations. Still, NASA is studying vibration as a possible tool for reducing muscle atrophy and bone loss during astronauts' long, weightless trips in space. And users of the equipment love the sensation and the quick workout. Workout times are reduced by two-thirds, advocates say, a claim that appeals to busy professionals, mothers of young children and just about anyone who shuns exercise. "I feel kind of tingly and a little like I got off a ship, kind of shaky but in a good way," said Amy Allen, a 40-year-old working mom in Chicago, after a 25-minute workout on the Power Plate, one of the higher-end brands. "I'm hoping this is the solution to help me get that extra weight off." The Power Plate vibrates 20 to 50 times a second in three directions, increasing g-forces on the body, and according to the Northbrook, Ill.-based company of the same name. The company says that raises the effectiveness of lunges, squats and other exercises done while standing on it. The workout is not aerobic; it's more like weightlifting without weights. "You don't really feel like you're working that hard, but then you get that sweat going and once the vibration stops, you can really feel it in your legs or upper body," said Michaela Zakheim, 45, who uses the machine at a fitness center in her Lincoln Park neighborhood. Power Plate sells models for home and gym at prices ranging from $3,000 to $10,500. Motors in the base make a low humming noise. Controls adjust the duration and intensity. The machines weigh 264 to 500 pounds and have handles to hang onto. Fitness trainers love them, but some users don't like the fact they can't read or watch TV while working out on them, said Craig Bradley, general manager of Holmes Place, an upscale Chicago health club that has four Power Plates. Doubts also stem from memories of the belt vibrators popular 50 years ago. Others have been won over though. "I think the machines are as good as the imagination of the person using them," Bradley said. Dozens of companies have entered the market, including Soloflex which has sold more than 30,000 of its $295 vibrating, skateboard-like, handle-free platforms in less than three years, said Jerry Wilson, the Hillsboro, Ore.-based company's CEO and founder. "We get reports back that it helps people with incontinence," Wilson said. "Their aches and pains have gone away. They're stronger. They sleep better. It has basically the same effects as if they'd started an exercise program." A study at NASA's Johnson Space Center showed that the use of a vibration platform during exercise squats made muscles work more, but it didn't look at whether vibration makes athletes run faster or jump higher. "Vibration works ... but we're still trying to figure out how to use it best and I think we're a number of years away before we do that," said Bill Amonette, one of the study authors and a fitness expert at the University of Houston-Clear Lake. "I think we have to be cautious of some of the claims. ... With aggressive marketing, sometimes they claim things that aren't necessarily true." Some researchers are also concerned that high-amplitude vibration can be dangerous over time since it can send jarring waves throughout the body, said Andrew Abercromby, another researcher at Johnson Space Center. "I believe, and I think quite a few other people believe, the jury is still out on it," Abercromby said. Clinton Rubin, a biomedical engineering professor at State University of New York at Stony Brook, said he has asked Power Plate to stop citing his research in its promotional materials. His work has led to a vibration device before the Food and Drug Administration approval for prevention and reversal of bone loss from osteoporosis, but that device uses much gentler vibrations than Power Plate, Rubin said. He believes the Power Plate's vibration levels could cause low back pain, cartilage damage, blurred vision, hearing loss and even brain damage. "I think they are cavalier in dismissing the dangers of chronic exposure," he said. "I'm a scientist. I worry that people are going to use this device based on a misrepresentation of science." Power Plate warns pregnant women and people with retinal detachment, blood clots, bone tumors and other medical conditions not to use the machines. Soloflex recommends using its device only 30 minutes a day because too much use would exceed industry standards for safe vibrations in the workplace. (The Occupational Safety and Health Administration doesn't set safety levels for fitness equipment, an agency spokesman said.) "I own a steel factory so I know whole body vibration has allowable exposure limits," Wilson said. "But too much aspirin is bad for one too." Baby sitter accused of raping baby boy The Schrammie: Michael Schreck, time to fess up Two dead in Eatonville crash Police: 'Missing' naval officer not missing Microsoft shows off 'coffee table of the future' Ken Schram: I'm sorry School evacuated after plumber finds body in air conditioning duct Miss USA booed at Miss Universe pageant Rosie O'Donnell says she may never speak to Elisabeth Hasselbeck again 'King of spam' arrested in Seattle
http://www.komotv.com/news/health/7730187.html Govt. quarantines man with dangerous case of TB quarantines man with dangerous case of TB May 29, 2007 at 12:21 PM PDT May 29, 2007 at 4:43 PM PDT ATLANTA (AP) - A man with a rare and dangerous form of tuberculosis ignored doctors' advice and took two trans-Atlantic flights, leading to the first U.S. government-ordered quarantine since 1963, health officials said Tuesday. The man, who officials did not identify, is at Atlanta's Grady Memorial Hospital in respiratory isolation. He was potentially infectious at the time of the flights, so officials at the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention recommended medical exams for cabin crew members on those flights, as well as passengers sitting in the same rows or within two rows. CDC officials did not release row numbers but said the airlines were working with health officials to contact those passengers. Passengers who should be tested will be contacted by health officials from their home countries. The infected man flew from Atlanta to Paris on May 12 aboard Air France Flight 385. He returned to North America on May 24 aboard Czech Air Flight 0104 from Prague to Montreal. The man then drove into the United States at the Champlain, N.Y., border crossing. The man told health officials he was not coughing during the flights. Tests indicated the amount of TB bacteria in him was low, so passengers are not considered to be at high risk of infection, said Dr. Martin Cetron, director of the CDC's division of global migration and quarantine. The man had been told by health officials in early May that he had a form of TB that was resistant to first-line antibiotics and was advised not to travel to Europe. "He was told traveling is against medical advice," said Dr. Steven Katkowsky, director of the Fulton County Department of Health & Wellness. Health officials said they don't know how the Georgia man was infected. The government issued the quarantine after a CDC official reached the man by phone in Rome and told him not to take commercial flights, but he flew back to North America anyway. "He was told in no uncertain terms not to take a flight back," Cetron said. Cetron reached the man once he was back in the United States. At that point, he voluntarily went to a New York hospital, then was flown by the CDC to the Atlanta hospital. He is not facing prosecution, health officials said. The quarantine order was the first since 1963, when the government quarantined a patient with smallpox, according to the CDC. The man, who went on the trip with his wife, also traveled within Europe, but CDC officials said they did not have information to release about whether the trips were by plane, train or other public transportation. His wife tested negative for TB before the trip and is not considered a public health risk, health officials said. CDC officials said they are concentrating on investigating the trans-Atlantic flights, when possibility of spread of the disease was greatest because he was in a confined space with other people for many hours. Tuberculosis is a disease caused by germs that are spread from person to person through the air. It usually affects the lungs and can lead to symptoms such as chest pain and coughing up blood. It kills nearly 2 million people each year worldwide. Because of antibiotics and other measures, the TB rate in the United States has been falling for years. Last year, it hit an all-time low of 13,767 cases, or about 4.6 cases per 100,000 Americans. Health officials worry about "multidrug-resistant" TB, which can withstand the mainline antibiotics isoniazid and rifampin. The man was infected with something even worse - "extensively drug-resistant" TB, also called XDR-TB, which resists many drugs used to treat the infection. There have been 17 U.S. XDR-TB cases since 2000, according to CDC statistics. Three-quarters were people from foreign countries. One case was a Russian man who arrived in Phoenix last year. He was jailed after he stopped taking medications and went unmasked to a restaurant and other businesses, threatening the health of others. The CDC's statement that the patient is at the low end of communicability "provides some reassurance," said Dr. William Schaffner, chairman of the department of preventive medicine at Vanderbilt University. The highly dangerous form is "expanding around the world," particularly in South Africa, eastern Europe and the former states of the Soviet Union, he said. Baby sitter accused of raping baby boy The Schrammie: Michael Schreck, time to fess up Two dead in Eatonville crash Police: 'Missing' naval officer not missing Microsoft shows off 'coffee table of the future' Ken Schram: I'm sorry School evacuated after plumber finds body in air conditioning duct Miss USA booed at Miss Universe pageant Rosie O'Donnell says she may never speak to Elisabeth Hasselbeck again 'King of spam' arrested in Seattle
http://www.komotv.com/news/health ill woman to donate kidney on reality show A Dutch reality show that claims to be trying to draw attention to a shortage of organ donors go ahead with a program in which a terminally ill woman will choose a contestant to receive one of her kidneys. CDC looking for 80 passengers, 27 crew from TB flights A man with a form of tuberculosis so dangerous he is under the first U.S. government-ordered quarantine since 1963 had health officials around the world scrambling Wednesday to find about 80 passengers who sat within five rows of him on two trans-Atlantic flights. US on mad cow: Don't test all cattle The Bush administration fight to keep meatpackers from testing all their animals for mad cow disease. New UN testing guidance aims to identify more people with HIV Health agency warns water-pipe smoking may pose same risk as cigarettes Advanced Medical says that contact lens solution recall not due to manufacturing problem Govt. quarantines man with dangerous case of TB New fitness vibration plates popular but may be risky, experts say Americans divided on whether doctors should help terminally ill patients die FDA says warning shouldn't interrupt MedImmune flu vaccine production Antibodies from bird flu survivors point to new therapy Poke holes in a lung? Research aims to ease breath-robbing disease As ultrasound machines shrink, patients worldwide reap the benefits Fitness boot camps hit the parks, offering workouts beyond the gym Army to teach soldiers combat lifesaving during basic training Triple amputee to graduate from UCLA medical school 6 medical workers convicted in HIV case in Libya found not guilty of defamation On eve of Kevorkian's release, only Oregon has assisted suicide law CDC: Brand of contact lens solution linked to rare eye infection FDA acts against unapproved long-acting cough and cold drugs Study: Type 1 diabetic kids who watched lots of TV had poor control of disease Between-meal snacks can be a good thing for the elderly 75% of U.S. households forbid smoking, study finds FDA blocks imports of Chinese toothpaste to test for deadly chemical New study calls for FDA to regulate tobacco, require lower nicotine levels Government to study best treatment of life-threatening child seizures Free cervical cancer vaccine arriving in Washington state Study suggests way to save more premature infants In marketing weight loss pill, drugmaker touts diet and exercise Birth-control pill that eliminates women's periods wins FDA approval Advanced trials planned for new Alzheimer's drug Diabetes drug Avandia raises the risk of heart attacks, study suggests States balk at bills to require cancer vaccine for preteen girls Baby sitter accused of raping baby boy The Schrammie: Michael Schreck, time to fess up Two dead in Eatonville crash Police: 'Missing' naval officer not missing Microsoft shows off 'coffee table of the future' Ken Schram: I'm sorry School evacuated after plumber finds body in air conditioning duct Miss USA booed at Miss Universe pageant Rosie O'Donnell says she may never speak to Elisabeth Hasselbeck again 'King of spam' arrested in Seattle
http://www.komotv.com/news/health/7749147.html CDC looking for 80 passengers, 27 crew from TB flights looking for 80 passengers, 27 crew from TB flights May 30, 2007 at 12:15 PM PDT May 30, 2007 at 12:15 PM PDT ATLANTA (AP) - A man with a form of tuberculosis so dangerous he is under the first U.S. government-ordered quarantine since 1963 had health officials around the world scrambling Wednesday to find about 80 passengers who sat within five rows of him on two trans-Atlantic flights. The man told a newspaper he took the first flight from Atlanta to Europe for his wedding, then the second flight home because he feared he might die without treatment in the U.S. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention Director Julie Gerberding said Wednesday that the CDC is working closely with airlines to find passengers who may have been exposed to the rare, dangerous strain. Health officials in France said they have asked Air France-KLM for passenger lists, and the Italian Health Ministry said it is tracing the man's movements. "Is the patient himself highly infectious? Fortunately, in this case, he's probably not," Gerberding said. "But the other piece is this bacteria is a very deadly bacteria. We just have to err on the side of caution." Dr. Martin Cetron, director of the CDC's division of global migration and quarantine, said Wednesday that the agency was trying to contact 27 crew members from the two flights for testing and about 80 passengers who sat in the five rows surrounding the man. About 40 or 50 of those people sat in or near Row 51 on the Air France flight from Atlanta to Paris, and about 30 passengers were in or near seat 12C on the second flight, from Prague to Montreal. Health officials said the man had been advised not to fly and knew he could expose others when he boarded the jets. The man, however, told The Atlanta Journal-Constitution that doctors didn't order him not to fly and only suggested he put off his long-planned wedding in Greece. He knew he had a form of tuberculosis and that it was resistant to first-line drugs, but he didn't realize until he was already in Europe that it could be so dangerous, he said. "We headed off to Greece thinking everything's fine," said the man, who declined to be identified because of the stigma attached to his diagnosis. He flew to Paris on May 12 aboard Air France Flight 385, also listed as Delta Air Lines codeshare Flight 8517. While he was in Europe, health authorities reached him with the news that further tests had revealed his TB was a rare, "extensively drug-resistant" form, far more dangerous than he knew. They ordered him into isolation, saying he should turn himself over to Italian officials. Instead, the man flew from Prague to Montreal on May 24 aboard Czech Air Flight 0104, then drove into the United States at Champlain, N.Y. He told the newspaper he was afraid that if he didn't get back to the U.S., he wouldn't get the treatment he needed to survive. He is now at Atlanta's Grady Memorial Hospital in respiratory isolation. A spokesman for Denver's National Jewish Hospital, which specializes in respiratory disorders, said Wednesday that the man would be treated there. It was not clear when he would arrive, spokesman William Allstetter said. "The patient continues to feel well and be asymptomatic. He's currently still in isolation," Cetron said Wednesday. Citing privacy concerns, he said the CDC "cannot and won't talk further about this patient." The other passengers on the flights are not considered at high risk of infection because tests indicated the amount of TB bacteria in the man was low, Cetron said. But Gerberding noted that U.S. health officials have had little experience with this type of TB. It's possible it may have different transmission patterns, she said. "We're thankful the patient was not in a highly infectious state, but we know the risk of transmission isn't zero, even with the fact that he didn't have symptoms and didn't appear to be coughing," Gerberding said on ABC's "Good Morning America." "We've got to really look at the people closest to him, get them skin tested." Dr. Howard Njoo of the Public Health Agency of Canada said it appeared unlikely that the man spread the disease on the flight into Canada. Still the agency was working with U.S. officials to contact passengers who sat near him. Daniela Hupakova, a spokeswoman for the Czech airline CSA, said the flight crew underwent medical checks and are fine. The airline was contacting passengers and cooperating with Czech and foreign authorities, she said. Health officials in France have asked Air France-KLM to provide lists of passengers seated within two rows of the man, an airline spokeswoman said on condition of anonymity according to company policy. The man told the Journal-Constitution he was in Rome during his honeymoon when the CDC notified him of the new tests and told him to turn himself in to Italian authorities to be isolated and be treated. The CDC told him he couldn't fly aboard commercial airliners. "I thought to myself: You're nuts. I wasn't going to do that. They told me I had been put on the no-fly list and my passport was flagged," the man said. He told the newspaper he and his wife decided to sneak back into the U.S. through Canada. He said he voluntarily went to a New York hospital, then was flown by the CDC to Atlanta. He is not facing prosecution, health officials said. "I'm a very well-educated, successful, intelligent person," he told the paper. "This is insane to me that I have an armed guard outside my door when I've cooperated with everything other than the whole solitary-confinement-in-Italy thing." CDC officials told The Associated Press they could not immediately comment on the interview. Health officials said the man's wife tested negative for TB before the trip and is not considered a public health risk. They said they don't know how the Georgia man was infected. The quarantine order was the first since the government quarantined a patient with smallpox in 1963, according to the CDC. Tuberculosis is caused by germs that are spread from person to person through the air. It usually affects the lungs and can lead to symptoms such as chest pain and coughing up blood. It kills nearly 2 million people each year worldwide. Because of antibiotics and other measures, the TB rate in the United States has been falling for years. Last year, it hit an all-time low of 13,767 cases, or about 4.6 cases per 100,000 Americans. Health officials worry about "multidrug-resistant" TB, which can withstand the mainline antibiotics isoniazid and rifampin. The man was infected with something even worse - "extensively drug-resistant" TB, also called XDR-TB, which resists many drugs used to treat the infection. There have been 17 U.S. XDR-TB cases since 2000, according to CDC statistics. Baby sitter accused of raping baby boy The Schrammie: Michael Schreck, time to fess up Two dead in Eatonville crash Police: 'Missing' naval officer not missing Microsoft shows off 'coffee table of the future' Ken Schram: I'm sorry School evacuated after plumber finds body in air conditioning duct Miss USA booed at Miss Universe pageant Rosie O'Donnell says she may never speak to Elisabeth Hasselbeck again 'King of spam' arrested in Seattle
http://www.komotv.com/news/health/7726402.html FDA says warning shouldn't interrupt MedImmune flu vaccine production says warning shouldn't interrupt MedImmune flu vaccine production May 29, 2007 at 8:26 AM PDT May 29, 2007 at 8:26 AM PDT WASHINGTON (AP) - A warning issued to MedImmune Inc. over manufacturing issues at a United Kingdom plant shouldn't significantly disrupt company production of its nasal spray flu vaccine, federal health officials said Tuesday. The Gaithersburg, Md., company disclosed last week the Food and Drug Administration had issued the warning for deviating from standard practices in its manufacturing of bulk lots of its FluMist vaccine. MedImmune and the FDA both said they were trying to resolve the issue, which involved bacteria and mold contamination at a very early stage of vaccine production. The contamination did not affect finished lots of the vaccine, the FDA said. The warning means the FDA is delaying approving FluMist for use in children as young as 1 until MedImmune develops a plan and begins to take corrective action. FluMist already is approved for patients 5 to 49. In 2004, the nation's flu-shot supply was abruptly cut in half when British regulators shut down a Chiron Corp. factory because of contamination concerns. FDA stressed its concerns with MedImmune do not rise to that level. "It is different from Chiron in that again, we do not have a product failure at this point," Mary Malarkey, director of compliance and biologics quality in the FDA office that oversees vaccines, told reporters. Baby sitter accused of raping baby boy The Schrammie: Michael Schreck, time to fess up Two dead in Eatonville crash Police: 'Missing' naval officer not missing Microsoft shows off 'coffee table of the future' Ken Schram: I'm sorry School evacuated after plumber finds body in air conditioning duct Miss USA booed at Miss Universe pageant Rosie O'Donnell says she may never speak to Elisabeth Hasselbeck again 'King of spam' arrested in Seattle
http://www.komotv.com/news/health/7747827.html US on mad cow: Don't test all cattle on mad cow: Don't test all cattle May 30, 2007 at 10:57 AM PDT May 30, 2007 at 10:57 AM PDT WASHINGTON (AP) - The Bush administration fight to keep meatpackers from testing all their animals for mad cow disease. The Agriculture Department tests less than 1 percent of slaughtered cows for the disease, which can be fatal to humans who eat tainted beef. But Kansas-based Creekstone Farms Premium Beef wants to test all of its cows. Larger meat companies feared that move because, if Creekstone tested its meat and advertised it as safe, they might have to perform the expensive test, too. The Agriculture Department regulates the test and argued that widespread testing could lead to a false positive that would harm the meat industry. A federal judge ruled in March that such tests must be allowed. U.S. District Judge James Robertson noted that Creekstone sought to use the same test the government relies on and said the government didn't have the authority to restrict it. The ruling was to take effect June 1, but the Agriculture Department appeal - effectively delaying the testing until the court challenge plays out. Mad cow disease, or bovine spongiform encephalopathy, is linked to more than 150 human deaths worldwide, mostly in Britain. There have been three cases of mad cow disease in the U.S. The first, in December 2003 in Washington state, was in a cow that had been imported from Canada. The second, in 2005, was in a Texas-born cow. The third was confirmed last year in an Alabama cow. Baby sitter accused of raping baby boy The Schrammie: Michael Schreck, time to fess up Two dead in Eatonville crash Police: 'Missing' naval officer not missing Microsoft shows off 'coffee table of the future' Ken Schram: I'm sorry School evacuated after plumber finds body in air conditioning duct Miss USA booed at Miss Universe pageant Rosie O'Donnell says she may never speak to Elisabeth Hasselbeck again 'King of spam' arrested in Seattle
http://www.komotv.com/news/health/7747757.html New UN testing guidance aims to identify more people with HIV UN testing guidance aims to identify more people with HIV May 30, 2007 at 10:54 AM PDT May 30, 2007 at 10:54 AM PDT LONDON (AP) - Health professionals should routinely offer to test people for HIV instead of waiting for patients to request it, according to new advice from the United Nations Wednesday. In making the recommendations, the World Health Organization and UNAIDS are underlining the need to identify the millions worldwide who need treatment. WHO estimates that approximately 80 percent of HIV-positive people in developing countries are currently unaware of their status. "If we are serious about ensuring universal access to drugs, there has to be a fundamental change in the approach to HIV testing," said Dr. Kevin De Cock, director of WHO's AIDS department. The UN now advises health workers to test patients for HIV as part of standard medical care, but only with the patient's informed consent. Yet there are questions about how the cash-strapped countries in Africa might adopt these guidelines. Of the estimated 40 million people living worldwide with HIV/AIDS, nearly 65 percent are in Africa. Because current estimates of the number of HIV/AIDS patients include people who don't know their status, experts do not expect the numbers to rise dramatically if more people are tested. Though universal testing will certainly identify more HIV-positive people needing lifesaving anti-retrovirals, there is already a long waiting list: Nearly 5 million people in sub-Saharan Africa are still without treatment. Identifying more AIDS patients whom countries cannot afford to treat threatens to create an even bigger backlog of people who know they are sick, but have no access to care. Most AIDS experts believe that increased HIV testing will help, even if the conditions are not perfect. "No one wants a situation where people find out they're HIV-positive and can't get anti-retroviral treatment," said Jennifer Kates, vice president and director of HIV policy for the Kaiser Family Foundation. "But if we waited until everything was perfectly aligned, we would never respond." Another benefit of testing: Past studies also have shown that once people are aware that they are HIV-positive, they tend to practice safer sex - which could give prevention efforts a boost. Africa's weak health infrastructure, though, is a huge stumbling block. The continent urgently needs at least another 4 million health workers to fill the gap, according to WHO. Without doctors and nurses to administer the HIV tests or to provide the necessary treatment when patients are identified, such guidance will create even more stress for Africa's already fragile health systems. Still, the new testing procedures should mean that HIV patients are found earlier. "The biggest problem we have now is that our health care systems are overburdened with very sick people who come in too late," said Zackie Achmat, chairman of South Africa's Treatment Action Campaign. "These new guidelines are long overdue," said Achmat. "We cannot deal with the burden on the health care service if we don't prevent people from becoming so sick that they become a supreme burden on it," he said. Increased HIV testing and the treatment and infrastructure it ultimately entails will require more money, yet no new funds have been announced to help countries implement these policies. The UN estimates that the fight against AIDS in 2007-2008 requires $22 billion, and there is still a considerable shortfall. Last year, the deficit for global AIDS programs was about $6 billion. While health authorities would like to see the new UN recommendations adopted much will depend on whether countries decide to follow their advice. "I hope that countries start implementing this immediately," said WHO's De Cock. "But we know you can't just flip the switch and change everything in one day." Baby sitter accused of raping baby boy The Schrammie: Michael Schreck, time to fess up Two dead in Eatonville crash Police: 'Missing' naval officer not missing Microsoft shows off 'coffee table of the future' Ken Schram: I'm sorry School evacuated after plumber finds body in air conditioning duct Miss USA booed at Miss Universe pageant Rosie O'Donnell says she may never speak to Elisabeth Hasselbeck again 'King of spam' arrested in Seattle
http://www.komotv.com/news/health/7747747.html Health agency warns water-pipe smoking may pose same risk as cigarettes agency warns water-pipe smoking may pose same risk as cigarettes May 30, 2007 at 10:53 AM PDT May 30, 2007 at 10:53 AM PDT GENEVA (AP) - Smoking from a water pipe may pose the same health risks as cigarettes, the World Health Organization said Tuesday, adding that there's a need for more research into the link between hookahs and a number of fatal illnesses. The hookah, used for centuries in North Africa, the Middle East and Central and South Asia, has become increasingly popular in the West, particularly among college students and young adults. Hookah bars have sprung up in cities across the United States, and groups of people often visit them to relax and talk while smoking from the water pipes. WHO, however, warned that using the water pipe to smoke tobacco is "not a safe alternative to cigarette smoking." In a seven-page document on the practice, the U.N. health agency said the rising popularity of hookahs is partly due to "unfounded assumptions" of safety and misleading commercial marketing. "Contrary to ancient lore and popular belief, the smoke that emerges from a water pipe contains numerous toxicants known to cause lung cancer, heart disease and other diseases," said WHO, which also issued a 50-page report Tuesday urging all countries to ban smoking in public buildings. WHO warned that using water pipes to consume shisha - a mixture of tobacco, molasses and fruit flavors - usually exposes a person to more smoke over a longer period of time than do cigarettes. The health agency said a person can inhale more than 100 times more smoke in a hookah session than in a single cigarette. By delivering nicotine, the water pipe can cause addiction. Preliminary research also indicates that hookah smoking may involve "some unique health risks," WHO said. A hookah typically consists of a bowl connected to a vase of water with a long tube and mouthpiece. The tobacco sits inside the bowl with a layer of foil and a hot coal on top. The shisha is not lit, instead heated by the charcoal, which users say produces a vapor different from smoke. "None of the accessories have been demonstrated to reduce smokers' exposure to toxins or risk of tobacco-related disease and death," WHO said. While further research is required, the health body said those exposed to secondhand hookah smoke appeared to be at risk of the same diseases as those exposed to cigarettes. WHO warned that hookah smoke could also increase the risk of adverse effects during pregnancy. Also Tuesday, WHO issued its strongest policy recommendations yet for controlling tobacco use, urging all countries to ban smoking at indoor workplaces and in public buildings. Tobacco use is the world's leading cause of preventable death, accounting for 10 percent of adult fatalities, according to WHO. It is responsible for 5.4 million deaths each year, a figure that is expected to rise to 8.3 million by 2030, the agency says. Increasing numbers of nonsmokers will also die unless governments take action, WHO said. It said governments of both rich and poor countries should declare all public indoor places smoke-free, by passing laws and actively enforcing measures to ensure that "everyone has a right to breathe clean air, free from tobacco smoke." Baby sitter accused of raping baby boy The Schrammie: Michael Schreck, time to fess up Two dead in Eatonville crash Police: 'Missing' naval officer not missing Microsoft shows off 'coffee table of the future' Ken Schram: I'm sorry School evacuated after plumber finds body in air conditioning duct Miss USA booed at Miss Universe pageant Rosie O'Donnell says she may never speak to Elisabeth Hasselbeck again 'King of spam' arrested in Seattle
http://www.komotv.com/news/health/7735622.html Advanced Medical says that contact lens solution recall not due to manufacturing problem Medical says that contact lens solution recall not due to manufacturing problem May 29, 2007 at 5:08 PM PDT May 29, 2007 at 10:11 PM PDT ATLANTA (AP) - The company involved in a voluntary recall of a contact lens solution by its product and blamed improper handling of contact lenses for the eye infections that forced the product to be pulled from the shelves. "What we're trying to handle right now ... is what the CDC hit us with," said James Mazzo, president and chief executive officer of Santa Ana, Calif.-based Advanced Medical Optics Inc., in a Tuesday morning conference call. Government officials Friday warned people to throw away AMO Complete Moisture Plus Multi-Purpose Solution, using for cleaning and storing soft contact lenses, after an investigation linked it to a rare eye infection. The solution seems to be a factor in cases of Acanthamoeba keratitis, a painful eye infection caused by a waterborne organism that, untreated, can lead to permanent vision loss or blindness, the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention said. "It's not a manufacturing problem or a contamination issue," said Mazzo, who added that the infection, also called "AK," affects people who improperly handle contact lenses, such as disinfecting them with water or wearing them while swimming or showering. "AK is something the vast majority of contact lens users typically avoid by following their eye practitioner's advice," Mazzo said. "All of our products ... have always met and continue to meet FDA requirements. Moisture Plus does what it is required to do." CDC officials said they drew a link between the Advanced Medical Optics product and the infection because 58 percent of confirmed cases who wore soft contact lenses had used the solution in the month before onset of symptoms, and 39 percent had used only that solution. They calculated that wearers of soft contact lenses who had the infection were at least seven times more likely to have used AMO Complete Moisture Plus than healthy people who wear soft contact lenses. It's generally difficult to draw a strong statistical conclusion from a small number of cases, but in this case an association between the product and the infection was clear-cut, CDC officials said. Health officials will continue to investigate why the association exists. But in the interest of public health, they decided a warning was necessary, said Dr. Sharon Roy, the CDC epidemiologist who led the investigation. Chief Financial Officer Randy Meier said that the Moisture Plus products' $105.7 million in 2006 sales represent about 10 percent of the company's total consolidated sales. "We're still working through the details to determine how much of that revenue will be impacted by the recall," Meier said. "It is impossible to assess what path we'll take or what the impact will be to our future earnings." Meier said the company will update investors early next week. "While this recall is clearly a setback for our eye care business, none of our other products will be affected," Meier said. Shares of Advanced Medical Optics fell 13.7 percent to $34.69 Tuesday. The CDC and the U.S. Food and Drug Administration are investigating 138 confirmed cases since January 2005. CDC officials said people should discard the solution, throw out their current contact lenses and toss away the lens storage case. All of them may harbor the infecting amoeba, said Michael Beach, team leader in the CDC's division of parasitic diseases. An estimated 85 percent of U.S. cases of Acanthamoeba keratitis occur in contact lens users, but it's extremely rare. The estimated prevalence is one to two cases per 1 million contact lens wearers. Contact lens wearers who practice proper lens care and people who don't wear contact lenses can still develop the infection. CDC information on Acanthamoeba Baby sitter accused of raping baby boy The Schrammie: Michael Schreck, time to fess up Two dead in Eatonville crash Police: 'Missing' naval officer not missing Microsoft shows off 'coffee table of the future' Ken Schram: I'm sorry School evacuated after plumber finds body in air conditioning duct Miss USA booed at Miss Universe pageant Rosie O'Donnell says she may never speak to Elisabeth Hasselbeck again 'King of spam' arrested in Seattle
http://www.komotv.com/news/health/7756472.html Terminally ill woman to donate kidney on reality show ill woman to donate kidney on reality show May 30, 2007 at 6:41 PM PDT May 30, 2007 at 7:11 PM PDT By TOBY STERLING Associated Press Writer AMSTERDAM, Netherlands (AP) - A Dutch reality show that claims to be trying to draw attention to a shortage of organ donors go ahead with a program in which a terminally ill woman will choose a contestant to receive one of her kidneys. The program, ''Big Donor Show,'' has been attacked as unethical and tasteless. One member of the Dutch parliament suggested the government should block Friday's broadcast. ''We know that this program is super controversial and some people will think it's tasteless, but we think the reality is even more shocking and tasteless: waiting for an organ is just like playing the lottery,'' Laurens Drillich, chairman of the BNN network, said in a statement. He said waiting lists in the Netherlands are more than four years long and 200 patients die annually for lack of a donor. The network identified the donor as ''Lisa,'' a 37-year-old woman with an inoperable brain tumor. During the show, she will hear interviews with the three candidates, their families and friends before choosing who will get her kidney. The show is being produced by Endemol NV, the creator of the ''Big Brother'' series. A spokeswoman for BNN said that there could be no guarantees the donation would actually be made, ''but the intention is'' Lisa's donation would be carried out before she died. That is because her wish to donate to a particular candidate ''wouldn't be valid anymore after her death'' under Dutch donation rules, Marieke Saly said. If Lisa does donate one kidney while living, the other kidney may still be awarded to someone else on a national donation waiting list under the country's organ allotment system. Viewers will be able to vote for the candidate they feel is most deserving via SMS text message, but ''Lisa will determine who the happy one is,'' BNN said in a statement. Saly could not say how much it will cost to send an SMS, but most TV programs charge around $1.35. Joop Atsma, a lawmaker of the ruling Christian Democrats, raised the issue in parliament, asking the government whether the program violated any law. ''Is it desirable that public broadcasting would go down this path, and is there no way to send a strong signal that we reject this?'' he said. Education Minister Ronald Plasterk, addressing parliament on behalf of the government because the health minister was ill, replied that there were serious questions about whether the transplant would actually go through as BNN has advertised it - but that there was no way to stop the program from airing. ''The information I have right now tells me that the program is unfitting and unethical, especially due to the competitive element, but it's up to program makers to make their choices,'' he said. ''The constitution forbids me from interfering in the content of programs: let there be no mistake about that, that would be censorship.'' He said that there were practical barriers. ''In every transplant the tissue of the donor and the patient must match as much as possible,'' Plasterk said. ''The doctors in this program can't make any concessions on that front.'' There also was doubt whether Lisa's organs could be donated at all because it might spread her cancer, he said. ''So it's very possible that in practical terms we're not talking about anything here, because it's possible this transplant can't take place,'' he said. Noting the shortage of donors, he said it was a good time for a debate on the question of what incentives to donate are ethical. He cited the example of a Dutch funeral home that is offering discounts to the families of people who were registered as donors, and an idea presented by the country's Kidney Institute to give registered donors preference on organ waiting lists. Copyright 2007 The Associated Press. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed. Baby sitter accused of raping baby boy The Schrammie: Michael Schreck, time to fess up Two dead in Eatonville crash Police: 'Missing' naval officer not missing Microsoft shows off 'coffee table of the future' Ken Schram: I'm sorry School evacuated after plumber finds body in air conditioning duct Miss USA booed at Miss Universe pageant Rosie O'Donnell says she may never speak to Elisabeth Hasselbeck again 'King of spam' arrested in Seattle
http://www.komotv.com/news/health/7769807.html TB on a plane? Such cases rare so far, but more likely in the future on a plane? Such cases rare so far, but more likely in the future May 31, 2007 at 12:31 PM PDT May 31, 2007 at 12:31 PM PDT ATLANTA (AP) - SARS on a plane. Mumps on a plane. And now a rare and deadly form of tuberculosis, on at least two planes. Commercial air travel's potential for spreading infection continues to cause handwringing among public health officials, as news of a jet-setting man with a rare and deadly form of TB demonstrates. "We always think of planes as a vehicle for spreading disease," said Dr. Doug Hardy, an infectious disease specialist at UT Southwestern Medical Center in Dallas. In the latest case, a Georgia man with extensively drug-resistant TB ignored doctors' advice and took two trans-Atlantic flights, leading to the first U.S. government-ordered quarantine since 1963. The man had been quarantined at Atlanta's Grady Memorial Hospital until Thursday morning, when he was transferred to Denver's National Jewish Hospital for treatment, Jewish Hospital spokesman William Allstetter said. He walked into the building and said he felt fine, Allstetter said. The hospital has treated two other patients with what appears to be the same strain of tuberculosis since 2000 and both improved enough to be released, according to Dr. Charles Daley, head of the infectious disease division at National Jewish. "I think we're more optimistic than what we have been hearing in reports that we will be able to control this infection," Daley told CNN Thursday morning. "We're aiming for cure. We know it's an uphill battle." The patient was not considered highly contagious, and there are no confirmed reports that his illness spread to other passengers. But the case illustrates ongoing concerns about the public health perils of plane travel, as well as the continuing problem of Typhoid Mary-like individuals who can almost be counted on to do the wrong thing. The man, Atlanta attorney Andrew Speaker, 31, whose father-in-law, Bob Cooksey, is a microbiologist who studies TB at the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, decided to proceed with a long-planned wedding trip despite being advised not to fly. "I'm hoping and praying that he's getting the proper treatment, that my daughter is holding up mentally and physically," Cooksey told The Associated Press on Thursday. "Had I known that my daughter was in any risk, I would not allow her to travel." The case points out weaknesses in the system: He was able to re-enter the United States, even though he said he had been warned by federal officials that his passport was being flagged and he was being placed on a no-fly list. CDC officials said they contacted the Department of Homeland Security to put him on a no-fly list, but it doesn't appear he was added by the time he flew from Prague to Montreal and drove across the border from Canada. "There's always going to be situations where there is a lack of understanding and appreciation of responsibility to the community in a situation like this," said Dr. John Ho, an infectious diseases specialist at New York-Presbyterian Hospital/Weill Cornell Medical Center. Challenges in coordinating with airlines and in communicating with the media also have emerged, said CDC spokesman Glen Nowak. "This clearly is going to have some relevance to our pandemic influenza preparedness," Nowak said. There have been several prominent disease-on-a-plane cases in recent years. Perhaps best known is severe acute respiratory syndrome, or SARS, which erupted in Asia in 2003. Over three months, CDC workers delayed on the tarmac 12,000 airplanes carrying 3 million passengers arriving from SARS-affected countries, isolating people with SARS symptoms. Last year, CDC officials worked with airlines and state health departments to track two infected airline passengers who may have helped spread a mumps epidemic throughout the Midwest. And in March, a flight from Hong Kong was held at Newark International Airport for two hours because some on board reported feeling ill from a flu-like illness. They were released when it became clear they had seasonal flu, and not an avian variety. Medical experts say TB is significantly less contagious than flu, SARS and other maladies that have led to airport alerts. "This is not as easily transmissible as what we're concerned about with a flu pandemic," said Dr. William Schaffner, chairman of the department of preventive medicine at Vanderbilt University. A more contagious bug, carried by a stubborn or evasive passenger, could be much more problematic, experts said. It's remarkable how rarely serious contagions are on planes, Ho noted. "If you count the number of international flights there are on a daily basis, this is really a minuscule event" in terms of rate of occurrence, he said. "However, this underscores the interrelatedness of the global community. We can no longer escape things considered foreign" in this age of jet-travel, Ho said. soon as they're published. Suspect arrested in fatal hit-and-run Cop mistakes daughter as intruder and shoots her Bee blamed for causing fatal bicycle crash Rare colorful lobster caught in Rhode Island Man expected to recover from train crash Colombia fights Bellevue diver over sunken treasure 5 Idahoans killed in Burbank crash Woman suffers serious head injuries in motorcycle crash Huge tree crashes down on emergency crew amid rescue Supreme Court reinstates death sentence in King County murder
http://www.komotv.com/news/health/7789141.html Cases of salmonella sickness linked to peanut butter top 600 of salmonella sickness linked to peanut butter top 600 Jun 1, 2007 at 11:28 AM PDT Jun 1, 2007 at 11:28 AM PDT OMAHA, Neb. (AP) - The number of people sickened since August by peanut butter tainted with salmonella has grown by more than 200, according to a new federal report. The outbreak, first reported in February, now includes 628 cases in 47 states, the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention said Thursday. It is the first update on the number of cases linked to the outbreak since early March, when officials said 425 cases had been confirmed in 44 states. ConAgra Foods Inc. recalled all its peanut butter after government investigators linked the bacteria outbreak to the Omaha-based company's Peter Pan and Great Value peanut butter. The CDC said the number of new salmonella cases dropped substantially after the peanut butter was recalled. The states with no illnesses reported are Hawaii, New Hampshire and Utah, the CDC said. Wal-Mart has continued selling Great Value peanut butter - its store brand - that is made by different suppliers, but Peter Pan has yet to return to stores. ConAgra plans to reintroduce Peter Pan in July. Initially, another company will produce the peanut butter because it doesn't expect to be able to resume production at its Sylvester, Ga., plant until sometime in August, after renovations. ConAgra officials have said they believe moisture in the plant likely helped bacteria to grow and later infect the finished product. Consumers who had jars of Peter Pan and Great Value peanut butter with a product code on the lid beginning with "2111" were urged to throw out the peanut butter. The jars or their lids can be returned to the store where they were purchased for a refund. soon as they're published. Suspect arrested in fatal hit-and-run Cop mistakes daughter as intruder and shoots her Bee blamed for causing fatal bicycle crash Rare colorful lobster caught in Rhode Island Man expected to recover from train crash Colombia fights Bellevue diver over sunken treasure 5 Idahoans killed in Burbank crash Woman suffers serious head injuries in motorcycle crash Huge tree crashes down on emergency crew amid rescue Supreme Court reinstates death sentence in King County murder
http://www.komotv.com/news/health/7789086.html Border worker disregarded TB warning worker disregarded TB warning Jun 1, 2007 at 11:26 AM PDT Jun 1, 2007 at 11:26 AM PDT ATLANTA (AP) - A globe-trotting Atlanta lawyer with a dangerous strain of tuberculosis was allowed back into the U.S. by a border inspector who disregarded a computer warning to stop him and don protective gear, officials said Thursday. The inspector has been removed from border duty. The unidentified inspector explained that he was no doctor but that the infected man seemed perfectly healthy and that he thought the warning was merely "discretionary," officials briefed on the case told The Associated Press. They spoke on condition of anonymity because the matter is still under investigation. The patient was identified as Andrew Speaker, a 31-year-old personal injury lawyer who returned last week from his wedding and honeymoon trip through Italy, the Greek isles and other spots in Europe. His new father-in-law, Robert C. Cooksey, is a CDC microbiologist whose specialty is TB and other bacteria. Cooksey would not comment on whether he reported his son-in-law to federal health authorities. Nor did the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention explain how the case came to their attention. However, Cooksey said that neither he nor his CDC laboratory was the source of his son-in-law's TB. Speaker is now under quarantine at a hospital in Denver. He is the first infected person to be quarantined by the U.S. government since 1963. The disclosure that the patient is a lawyer - and specifically a personal injury lawyer - outraged many people on the Internet and elsewhere. Some travelers who flew on the same planes with Speaker angrily accused him of selfishly putting hundreds of people's lives in danger. "It's still very scary," 21-year-old Laney Wiggins, one of more than two dozen University of South Carolina-Aiken students who are getting skin tests for TB. "That is an outrageous number of people that he was very reckless with their health. It's not fair. It's selfish." Speaker said in an interview with The Atlanta Journal-Constitution that he knew he had TB when he flew from Atlanta to Europe in mid-May for his wedding and honeymoon, but that he did not find out until he was already in Rome that it was an extensively drug-resistant strain considered especially dangerous. On its Web site, ABC said "Good Morning America" planned to air an interview Friday morning in which Speaker says he has a tape recording of a meeting with health officials that he claims will confirm his view that it was all right to travel in his condition. He also asks for forgiveness from other passengers, ABC said. Despite warnings from federal health officials not to board another long flight, he flew home for treatment, fearing he wouldn't survive if he didn't reach the U.S., he told the Atlanta paper. He said he tried to sneak home by way of Canada instead of flying directly into the U.S. He was quarantined May 25, a day after he was allowed to pass through the border crossing at Champlain, N.Y., along the Canadian border. The inspector ran Speaker's passport through a computer, and a warning - including instructions to hold the traveler, don a protective mask in dealing with him, and telephone health authorities - popped up, officials said. About a minute later, Speaker was instead cleared to continue on his journey, according to officials familiar with the records. The Homeland Security Department is investigating. The border officer "who questioned that person is at present performing administrative duties," said Homeland Security spokesman Russ Knocke, adding that the officer is not checking people at the land border crossing. Colleen Kelley, president of the union that represents customs and border agents, declined to comment on the specifics of the case, but said "public health issues were not receiving adequate attention and training" within the agency. On Thursday, a tan and healthy-looking Speaker was flown from Atlanta to Denver, accompanied by his wife and federal marshals, to Denver's National Jewish Medical and Research Center, where doctors planned to isolate him and treat him with oral and intravenous antibiotics. Dr. Charles Daley, chief of the hospital's infectious-disease division, said he is optimistic Speaker can be cured because he is believed to be in the early stages of the disease. Dr. Gwen Huitt of National Jewish described Speaker as "a young, healthy individual" who is "doing extremely well." "By conventional methods that we traditionally use in the public health arena ... he would be considered low infectivity at this point in time," she said. "He is not coughing, he is healthy, he does not have a fever." Doctors hope also to determine where he contracted the disease, which has been found around the world and exists in pockets in Russia and Asia. Speaker's tuberculosis was discovered when he had a chest X-ray in January for a rib injury, Huitt said. His care - which could also include surgery - could cost between $250,000 to $350,000, she said. The air ambulance flight and other costs of transporting him from Atlanta to Denver on Thursday morning totaled another $12,000, said a spokeswoman for Kaiser Permanente, Speaker's health insurer, which paid the bill. He will be kept in a special unit with a ventilation system to prevent the escape of germs. "He may not leave that room much for several weeks," hospital spokesman William Allstetter said. Speaker's father-in-law has worked at the CDC for 32 years and is in the Division of Tuberculosis Elimination, where he works with TB and other organisms. He has co-authored papers on diabetes, TB and other diseases. "As part of my job, I am regularly tested for TB. I do not have TB, nor have I ever had TB," he said in a statement. "My son-in-law's TB did not originate from myself or the CDC's labs, which operate under the highest levels of biosecurity." In a brief telephone interview with the AP, Cooksey said that he gave Speaker "fatherly advice" when he learned the young man had contracted the disease. "I'm hoping and praying that he's getting the proper treatment, that my daughter is holding up mentally and physically," Cooksey said. "Had I known that my daughter was in any risk, I would not allow her to travel." According to a biography posted on a Web site connected with Speaker's law firm, the young lawyer attended the U.S. Naval Academy, graduated from the University of Georgia with a degree in finance, and then attended University of Georgia's law school. He is in private practice with his father, Ted Speaker, an unsuccessful candidate for a judgeship in 2004. Speaker's father told WSB-TV: "The way he's been shown and spoken about on TV, it's like a terrorist traveling around the world escaping authorities. It's blown out of proportion immensely." Andrew Speaker recently moved from an upscale condominium complex in anticipation of his wedding, former neighbors said. He also wrote in an application to become a board member of his condo association that he was going to Vietnam for five weeks as part of the Rotary Club to act as an ambassador. His wife, Sarah, is a third-year law student at Atlanta's Emory University. "He's a great guy. Gregarious," said Pam Hood, a former neighbor. "He's a wonderful guy. Just a very, very pleasant man." Health officials in North America and Europe are now trying to track down about 80 passengers who sat near him on his two trans-Atlantic flights, and they want passenger lists from four shorter flights he took while in Europe. However, other passengers are not considered at high risk of infection because tests indicated the amount of TB bacteria in Speaker was low, said Dr. Martin Cetron, director of the CDC's division of global migration and quarantine. Health law experts said Speaker could be sued if others contract TB. "There are a number of cases that say a person who negligently transmits an infectious disease could be held liable," said Lawrence Gostin, a public health law expert at Georgetown University. "So long as he knew it was infectious, and knew about the appropriate behavior but failed to comply, he could be held liable." Speaker told the Journal-Constitution that he wasn't coughing and that doctors initially did not order him not to fly and only suggested he put off his long-planned wedding. "We headed off to Greece thinking everything's fine," he told the newspaper. soon as they're published. Suspect arrested in fatal hit-and-run Cop mistakes daughter as intruder and shoots her Bee blamed for causing fatal bicycle crash Rare colorful lobster caught in Rhode Island Man expected to recover from train crash Colombia fights Bellevue diver over sunken treasure 5 Idahoans killed in Burbank crash Woman suffers serious head injuries in motorcycle crash Huge tree crashes down on emergency crew amid rescue Supreme Court reinstates death sentence in King County murder
http://www.komotv.com/news/health/7825042.html Liver cancer patients get hope from kidney cancer drug cancer patients get hope from kidney cancer drug Jun 4, 2007 at 9:15 AM PDT Jun 4, 2007 at 9:15 AM PDT CHICAGO (AP) - For the first time, doctors say they have found a pill that improves survival for people with liver cancer, a notoriously hard to treat disease diagnosed in more than half a million people globally each year. The results in a multinational study of 602 patients with advanced liver cancer are impressive and likely will change the way patients are treated, cancer specialists including the study authors say. Patients got either two tablets daily of a drug called sorafenib or dummy pills in the study, which started in March 2005. Some patients are still alive, although on average, sorafenib patients survived 10.7 months versus almost 8 months for those on dummy pills. That type of survival advantage "has never happened" with liver cancer "and is a major breakthrough in the management of the disease," said Dr. Josep Llovet, the lead author. "That may not sound like a lot of time," but for liver cancer, "this is actually a quite impressive gain," said Dr. Nancy Davidson of Johns Hopkins' Bloomberg School of Public Health. "It is the first effective systemic treatment for liver cancer, which is such a huge problem internationally." Sorafenib attacks cancer with a targeted double-barreled approach. It zeros in on malignant cells themselves and cuts off the blood supply feeding the tumor. It is believed to work on tumors within the liver and those that have spread elsewhere. In the study, tumors didn't shrink or disappear but in many cases they also didn't grow. "You are not curing the disease but you are delaying the progression of the disease significantly and strikingly," said Llovet, of Mount Sinai School of Medicine in New York and Hospital Clinic of Barcelona, Spain. The study was halted early, in February, because of the good results, and patients on dummy pills were switched to sorafenib. "This is a very good step forward in this disease," said Dr. Emily Chan of Vanderbilt-Ingram Cancer Center in Nashville, Tenn. Results were prepared for release Monday in Chicago at the American Society of Clinical Oncology's annual meeting. The drug, sold under the brand name Nexavar, is approved in the United States and dozens of other countries to treat advanced kidney cancer. It is marketed by Bayer Pharmaceuticals Corp. and Onyx Pharmaceuticals Inc., which funded the liver cancer study. They hope to receive approval for liver cancer use from U.S. and foreign regulators. Llovet has done consulting for the sponsors. Liver cancer is diagnosed in about 19,000 Americans annually but is much more common elsewhere and is the fifth most common cancer globally. Risk factors include chronic liver infections and some forms of hepatitis. The disease is common in China and countries without widespread use of the hepatitis B vaccine, which is routinely given to U.S. infants. Liver cancer doesn't respond well to conventional chemotherapy and is often diagnosed too late for surgery to be an option. Many patients die within a year of diagnosis. Robert Throckmorton, a 73-year-old attorney in Orange County, Calif., said his doctor told him "You better get your affairs in order" after he was diagnosed with inoperable liver cancer last August. But then the doctor offered sorafenib off-label, and Throckmorton readily agreed. He did not take part in the study. After nine months on the drug, Throckmorton said his cancer shows no sign of progression and he has no significant side effects. He said he walks three miles six days a week to stay active and feels fine. Instead of thinking about wills and funerals, Throckmorton is looking forward to get-togethers with his eight children and 18 grandchildren, and even a possible church trip to Uruguay with his wife. "I have good energy," Throckmorton said. "We are optimistic." soon as they're published. Suspect arrested in fatal hit-and-run Cop mistakes daughter as intruder and shoots her Bee blamed for causing fatal bicycle crash Rare colorful lobster caught in Rhode Island Man expected to recover from train crash Colombia fights Bellevue diver over sunken treasure 5 Idahoans killed in Burbank crash Woman suffers serious head injuries in motorcycle crash Huge tree crashes down on emergency crew amid rescue Supreme Court reinstates death sentence in King County murder
http://www.komotv.com/news/health/7824982.html Docs say rolling sneakers responsible for rash of injuries say rolling sneakers responsible for rash of injuries Jun 4, 2007 at 9:13 AM PDT Jun 4, 2007 at 9:13 AM PDT CHICAGO (AP) - Trendy wheeled sneakers that let kids zip down sidewalks, across playgrounds and through mall crowds could also send them rolling into emergency rooms on a stretcher, say doctors who blame a rash of injuries on the international craze. It's called "heeling," named after Heelys, the most popular brand. They're sold in 70 countries and are so hot that their Carrollton, Texas, maker, Heelys Inc., recently landed atop BusinessWeek's annual list of fastest growing companies. But doctors from Ireland to Singapore have reported treating broken wrists, arms and ankles; dislocated elbows and even cracked skulls in children injured while wearing roller shoes. Over a 10-week period last summer, 67 children were treated for injuries from Heelys or strap-on wheels called Street Gliders at Temple Street Children's University Hospital in Dublin, Ireland, according to a report in the June edition of Pediatrics. From September 2005 through December 2006, one death and at least 64 roller-shoe injuries were reported to the U.S. Consumer Product Safety Commission, a spokesman said last week. And doctors in Singapore reported last year that 37 children had been treated for similar injuries at a hospital there during a seven-month period in 2004. None were wearing protective gear. The American Academy of Orthopaedic Surgeons, based in Rosemont, Ill., this week is issuing new safety advice that recommends helmets, wrist protectors and knee and elbow pads for kids who wear wheeled shoes. "As these shoes are sold in department stores, parents buying them may develop a false sense of security - that they are like any other shoe," said Dr. James Beaty, academy president and a pediatric orthopedic surgeon in Memphis. Heelys and their knockoffs look like gym shoes, but with wheel sockets in each heel. They can be used for walking, but the wheels pop out when users shift their weight to their heels. Balancing on the wheels can be tricky, especially for novices. In the Irish study, most injuries were in new users and occurred when kids fell backward while trying to transfer their body weight. Dr. Leon Benson of Evanston Northwestern Healthcare in Evanston, Ill., recalled treating a 9-year-old girl who'd had her Heelys for just a week when she fell and broke both wrists. Nine-year-old Noah Woelfel of Davidsonville, Md., wasn't a novice but still tripped and fell, breaking several fingers and wrist bones in his right hand last year. "All it took was a tiny piece of gravel in the driveway that went up in the wheel and stopped him cold," said his mother, Nancy. "He required surgery and pins, and he was six weeks without using his hand, right at the beginning of school." She threw the removable wheels away and said other parents should know about the risks. Dr. Dominic Catanese, a foot specialist at Montefiore Medical Center in New York, said balancing on heels can strain feet and Achilles tendons. He has treated several Heelys-related ankle injuries and won't let his 7-year-old daughter have the shoes. "She wants them. Not happening. Just like I took away her trampoline" after reading about trampoline injuries. "It went right to Goodwill," Catanese said. Heelys in April said a study it commissioned shows that their shoes have a safer injury rate than skateboarding, inline skating and even swimming. The shoes are sold with safety information including a recommendation to wear protective gear. The company says it has shipped more than 10 million pairs since their introduction in 2000. Heelys reported first-quarter income of $8.5 million, five times higher than last year. Still, some walkers find heelers who zip in and out of crowds a nuisance, and many schools and shopping malls have banned them. Kelly Ford, 14, used to cruise down the halls of her Chicago grammar school in Heelys - a practice that led teachers to confiscate some kids' wheels. Now a high school freshman, Ford has outgrown her Heelys. She said kids who wear them won't pay much attention to safety warnings. "I don't think any kid is going to want to wear a helmet to school," Ford said. She thinks Heelys are being unfairly targeted. "It's just like, let your kid have fun. I think they're fine," Ford said. soon as they're published. Suspect arrested in fatal hit-and-run Cop mistakes daughter as intruder and shoots her Bee blamed for causing fatal bicycle crash Rare colorful lobster caught in Rhode Island Man expected to recover from train crash Colombia fights Bellevue diver over sunken treasure 5 Idahoans killed in Burbank crash Woman suffers serious head injuries in motorcycle crash Huge tree crashes down on emergency crew amid rescue Man, woman dead in Kent murder-suicide
http://www.komotv.com/news/health/7769552.html Quarantined TB patient is the son-in-law of a CDC microbiologist TB patient is the son-in-law of a CDC microbiologist May 31, 2007 at 12:27 PM PDT May 31, 2007 at 2:32 PM PDT ATLANTA (AP) - A globe-trotting Atlanta lawyer with a dangerous strain of tuberculosis was allowed back into the U.S. by a border inspector who disregarded a computer warning to stop him and don protective gear, officials said Thursday. The inspector has been removed from border duty. The unidentified inspector explained that he was no doctor but that the infected man seemed perfectly healthy and that he thought the warning was merely "discretionary," officials briefed on the case told The Associated Press. They spoke on condition of anonymity because the matter is still under investigation. The patient was identified as Andrew Speaker, a 31-year-old personal injury lawyer who returned last week from his wedding and honeymoon trip through Italy, the Greek isles and other spots in Europe. His new father-in-law, Robert C. Cooksey, is a CDC microbiologist whose specialty is TB and other bacteria. Cooksey would not comment on whether he reported his son-in-law to federal health authorities. Nor did the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention explain how the case came to their attention. However, Cooksey said that neither he nor his CDC laboratory was the source of his son-in-law's TB. Speaker is now under quarantine at a hospital in Denver. He is the first infected person to be quarantined by the U.S. government since 1963. The disclosure that the patient is a lawyer - and specifically a personal injury lawyer - outraged many people on the Internet and elsewhere. Some travelers who flew on the same planes with Speaker angrily accused him of selfishly putting hundreds of people's lives in danger. "It's still very scary," 21-year-old Laney Wiggins, one of more than two dozen University of South Carolina-Aiken students who are getting skin tests for TB. "That is an outrageous number of people that he was very reckless with their health. It's not fair. It's selfish." Speaker said in a newspaper interview that he knew he had TB when he flew from Atlanta to Europe in mid-May for his wedding and honeymoon, but that he did not find out until he was already in Rome that it was an extensively drug-resistant strain considered especially dangerous. Despite warnings from federal health officials not to board another long flight, he flew home for treatment, fearing he wouldn't survive if he didn't reach the U.S., he said. He said he tried to sneak home by way of Canada instead of flying directly into the U.S. He was quarantined May 25, a day after he was allowed to pass through the border crossing at Champlain, N.Y., along the Canadian border. The inspector ran Speaker's passport through a computer, and a warning - including instructions to hold the traveler, don a protective mask in dealing with him, and telephone health authorities - popped up, officials said. About a minute later, Speaker was instead cleared to continue on his journey, according to officials familiar with the records. The Homeland Security Department is investigating. "The border agent who questioned that person is at present performing administrative duties," said Homeland Security spokesman Russ Knocke, adding those duties do not include checking people at the land border crossing. Colleen Kelley, president of the union that represents customs and border agents, declined to comment on the specifics of the case, but said "public health issues were not receiving adequate attention and training" within the agency. On Thursday, a tan and healthy-looking Speaker was flown from Atlanta to Denver, accompanied by his wife and federal marshals, to Denver's National Jewish Medical and Research Center, where doctors planned to isolate him and treat him with oral and intravenous antibiotics. Dr. Charles Daley, chief of the hospital's infectious-disease division, said he is optimistic Speaker can be cured because he is believed to be in the early stages of the disease. Dr. Gwen Huitt of National Jewish described Speaker as "a young, healthy individual" who is "doing extremely well." "By conventional methods that we traditionally use in the public health arena ... he would be considered low infectivity at this point in time," she said. "He is not coughing, he is healthy, he does not have a fever." Doctors hope also to determine where he contracted the disease, which has been found around the world and exists in pockets in Russia and Asia. He will be kept in a special unit with a ventilation system to prevent the escape of germs. "He may not leave that room much for several weeks," hospital spokesman William Allstetter said. Speaker's father-in-law has worked at the CDC for 32 years and is in the Division of Tuberculosis Elimination, where he works with TB and other organisms. He has co-authored papers on diabetes, TB and other infectious diseases. "As part of my job, I am regularly tested for TB. I do not have TB, nor have I ever had TB," he said in a statement. "My son-in-law's TB did not originate from myself or the CDC's labs, which operate under the highest levels of biosecurity." In a brief telephone interview with the AP, Cooksey said that he gave Speaker "fatherly advice" when he learned the young man had contracted the disease. "I'm hoping and praying that he's getting the proper treatment, that my daughter is holding up mentally and physically," Cooksey said. "Had I known that my daughter was in any risk, I would not allow her to travel." According to a biography posted on a Web site connected with Speaker's law firm, the young lawyer attended the U.S. Naval Academy, graduated from the University of Georgia with a degree in finance, then attended University of Georgia's law school. He is in private practice with his father, Ted Speaker, an unsuccessful candidate for a judgeship in 2004. Speaker's father told WSB-TV: "The way he's been shown and spoken about on TV, it's like a terrorist traveling around the world escaping authorities. It's blown out of proportion immensely." Andrew Speaker recently moved from an upscale condominium complex in anticipation of his wedding, former neighbors said. He also wrote in an application to become a board member of his condo association that he was going to Vietnam for five weeks as part of the Rotary Club to act as an ambassador. His wife, Sarah, is a third-year law student at Atlanta's Emory University. "He's a great guy. Gregarious," said Pam Hood, a former neighbor. "He's a wonderful guy. Just a very, very pleasant man." Health officials in North America and Europe are now trying to track down about 80 passengers who sat near him on his two trans-Atlantic flights, and they want passenger lists from four shorter flights he took while in Europe. However, other passengers are not considered at high risk of infection because tests indicated the amount of TB bacteria in Speaker was low, said Dr. Martin Cetron, director of the CDC's division of global migration and quarantine. Health law experts said Speaker could be sued if others contract TB. "There are a number of cases that say a person who negligently transmits an infectious disease could be held liable," said Lawrence Gostin, a public health law expert at Georgetown University. "So long as he knew it was infectious, and knew about the appropriate behavior but failed to comply, he could be held liable." Speaker told The Atlanta Journal-Constitution that he wasn't coughing and that doctors initially did not order him not to fly and only suggested he put off his long-planned wedding. "We headed off to Greece thinking everything's fine," he told the newspaper. soon as they're published. Suspect arrested in fatal hit-and-run Cop mistakes daughter as intruder and shoots her Bee blamed for causing fatal bicycle crash Rare colorful lobster caught in Rhode Island Man expected to recover from train crash Colombia fights Bellevue diver over sunken treasure 5 Idahoans killed in Burbank crash Woman suffers serious head injuries in motorcycle crash Huge tree crashes down on emergency crew amid rescue Supreme Court reinstates death sentence in King County murder
http://www.komotv.com/news/health/7806602.html Radiation to the head limits lung cancer spread, boost survival, study finds to the head limits lung cancer spread, boost survival, study finds Jun 2, 2007 at 3:26 PM PDT Jun 2, 2007 at 3:26 PM PDT CHICAGO (AP) - A week or two of radiation to the head helped keep a very deadly form of lung cancer from spreading to the brain, improving survival for some people who have had little hope of successful treatment until now, Dutch doctors reported Saturday. It is the first time that preventive radiation to the head has prolonged the lives of people with cancer that has spread extensively elsewhere. The results may encourage doctors to test this approach for advanced breast cancers and other types of lung cancer, specialists said. "The fact that this improves survival is extraordinary," because many doctors would have been happy if it merely prevented complications like seizures, said Dr. Roy Herbst, lung cancer chief at the University of Texas M.D. Anderson Cancer Center in Houston, who had no role in the study. "This should become standard of care almost immediately," he predicted, adding that most cancer centers in the country are capable of offering it. Results of the study were reported Saturday at an American Society of Clinical Oncology conference. The study involved small cell lung cancer, which accounts for roughly 15 percent of all lung cancers, or about 32,000 cases each year in the United States. Two-thirds of the time, the cancer has already spread when it is diagnosed. Such patients are at high risk of it spreading further, to the brain, where it can cause seizures, difficulty walking and talking, and other problems that often prove fatal. Preventive radiation to the head already is given to people with earlier-stage cancers. Dr. Ben Slotman of the VU University Medical Center in Amsterdam, the Netherlands, tested it on 143 patients with more extensive disease, and compared results to a similar group that did not receive the treatment. One year later, 27 percent of those given brain radiation were alive versus just over 13 percent of the others. Only 15 percent of the radiation group had signs of tumors in the brain compared to 44 percent of the others. About 30 percent of those receiving radiation had some nausea, vomiting and headaches, but side effects generally were mild, Slotman said. However, the possibility of causing cognitive problems has made some doctors worry about using radiation widely until more studies are done, said Dr. Eric Winer, a breast cancer specialist at Dana Farber Cancer Institute in Boston. "If radiation to the brain were as simple as giving Tylenol, you could give it to everybody," said Winer, who was not involved in the study. With breast cancer, often it is the spread to the liver and other organs that proves fatal rather than to the brain, he said. soon as they're published. Suspect arrested in fatal hit-and-run Cop mistakes daughter as intruder and shoots her Bee blamed for causing fatal bicycle crash Rare colorful lobster caught in Rhode Island Man expected to recover from train crash Colombia fights Bellevue diver over sunken treasure 5 Idahoans killed in Burbank crash Woman suffers serious head injuries in motorcycle crash Huge tree crashes down on emergency crew amid rescue Supreme Court reinstates death sentence in King County murder
http://www.komotv.com/news/health/7805917.html Study: Ginseng, flaxseed may fight cancer, but shark cartilage worthless Ginseng, flaxseed may fight cancer, but shark cartilage worthless Jun 2, 2007 at 12:13 PM PDT Jun 2, 2007 at 12:13 PM PDT CHICAGO (AP) - The first scientific tests of some popular alternative medicine products hint that American ginseng might lessen cancer fatigue and that flaxseed might slow the growth of prostate tumors. But a big study proved shark cartilage worthless against lung cancer, and doctors said people should not take it. The research was reported Saturday at an American Society of Clinical Oncology conference. The ginseng and flaxseed studies are small and preliminary, and specialists warned against making too much of them because the substances tested are not the same as what consumers find on store shelves. But the results suggest that some herbal remedies eventually may find niches for treating specific cancers, symptoms or side effects. Americans spend millions on these products, which are not approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration, even though no good studies confirm the benefits they tout. "One of the most common things patients ask me is about these things they have snookered away in their purses" and medicine chests, said Dr. Bruce Cheson, a cancer specialist at Georgetown University Hospital. "They'll come in with big bags of this stuff." Some "natural" remedies such as laetrile or high doses vitamin C proved not helpful and even harmful for cancer patients once they were scientifically studied, he noted. Some keep chemotherapy from working as it should. "Just because it is a vitamin or a leafy green does not ensure it does not have some harmful effects," Cheson said. Herbal products vary widely in their purity and the amount and type of active ingredients. These three federally funded studies used standardized compounds so they could say with some certainty whether they have any effect. Debra Barton, a research nurse at the Mayo Clinic in Rochester, Minn., tested powdered, four-year-old Wisconsin ginseng root, which is different from Asian ginseng and other varieties commonly sold, to treat the extreme tiredness that most people suffer from cancer or its treatment. She randomly assigned 282 people with breast, lung, colon and other forms of cancer to take either 750, 1,000 or 2,000 milligrams of ginseng or dummy capsules daily for eight weeks. Neither the participants nor the researchers knew who received what. One-fourth of those on the two highest doses said their fatigue was moderately or much better, compared with only 10 percent of those on the low dose or dummy pills. Results are promising, but it is too soon to recommend that people use ginseng, Barton said. A better idea is exercise - the one treatment already shown to help cancer fatigue, she said. The flaxseed study was aimed at fighting prostate cancer, not treating a side effect. The edible seed has been used for hundreds of years in cereals and breads and is high in beneficial omega-3 fatty acids and in lignan, a substance that can affect hormone levels and perhaps squelch their cancer-promoting effects. Four groups of about 40 men who were scheduled to have their prostates removed three weeks later were assigned to get either 30 grams of powdered flaxseed, a low-fat diet, both or neither until their surgery. After the men's prostates were removed, researchers found that tumors had been growing 30 to 40 percent slower in the two groups taking flaxseed, based on how quickly cells were multiplying. Low-fat diets had no effect on this, said Wendy Demark-Wahnefried of Duke University Medical Center, who led the study. "Our findings are compelling but they're preliminary," she cautioned. But several doctors said flaxseed is nutritious and seems to have little downside other than a sawdust-like consistency, since it must be used ground or powdered because it has an inedible hull or coating. Scientists plans to study flaxseed on men with prostate cancer that comes back after initial treatment, and Canadian scientists also are testing it for breast cancer, she said. The shark cartilage study was done because Congress ordered it. Some very small early studies suggested high doses of it might extend survival of people with advanced cases of non-small cell lung cancer, the most common form of the disease. Dr. Charles Lu of the University of Texas M.D. Anderson Cancer Center in Houston tested Neovastat, a shark cartilage liquid extract that the Canadian company Aeterna-Zentaris was trying to develop as a regular pharmaceutical product. All 379 people in the study, which was done throughout Canada and the United States, were given standard chemotherapy and radiation. Half also were given shark cartilage twice a day. After about four years there was no difference in survival, which averaged 15 months for both groups. soon as they're published. Suspect arrested in fatal hit-and-run Cop mistakes daughter as intruder and shoots her Bee blamed for causing fatal bicycle crash Rare colorful lobster caught in Rhode Island Man expected to recover from train crash Colombia fights Bellevue diver over sunken treasure 5 Idahoans killed in Burbank crash Woman suffers serious head injuries in motorcycle crash Huge tree crashes down on emergency crew amid rescue Supreme Court reinstates death sentence in King County murder
http://www.komotv.com/news/health/7814117.html Less radiation OK for breast cancer radiation OK for breast cancer Jun 3, 2007 at 11:48 AM PDT Jun 3, 2007 at 11:48 AM PDT CHICAGO (AP) - Women with early-stage breast tumors can undergo a shorter course of radiation without a greater risk that their cancer will come back years later, the largest study to test this suggests. The results are good news for women who must quit work or travel far to receive the five-week, daily treatments usually given. ''This is very disruptive to your life. If we could achieve the same outcome with less frequent visits to the radiation center ... this would be a tremendous benefit,'' said Dr. Julie Gralow of the Fred Hutchinson Cancer Center in Seattle. Gralow was not involved in the study, but reviewed and discussed it at a meeting Sunday of the American Society of Clinical Oncology. Most of the 180,000 breast cancers diagnosed each year in the United States are the type this study addressed - still confined to the breast. The usual treatment is surgery plus chemotherapy or hormone therapy, followed by radiation to prevent a recurrence. Dr. John Dewar of the University of Dundee in Scotland led a two-part study of nearly 4,500 women in the United Kingdom to test shorter courses of radiation. Women received either the standard 50 Grays, the unit used in measuring radiation, in 25 treatments spread over five weeks, or roughly 40 Grays given in 13 treatments every other day for five weeks or in 15 treatments over three weeks. Five years later, cancer recurrence rates were low for all groups, ranging from 2 to 5 percent. So few recurrences occurred - 158 - that doctors believe the treatments are equivalent but cannot say so with certainty. Many will want to see what happens to these women with longer follow up, said Dr. Gary Freedman of Fox Chase Cancer Center in Philadelphia. He is testing a shorter course, too, and noted that in the United States, most doctors give a total of 60 to 64 Grays - the standard 50 plus a boost dose directly to the tumor area. Lisa Warren is a patient who received the shorter course in Freedman's study. Warren, 46, lives nearly an hour's drive from the cancer center and was eager when the short course was offered. ''I was all for that,'' she said. ''Seven weeks is a long time to be running back and forth. Mentally and physically, it's very draining.'' Gralow, whose Seattle clinic sees many Alaskan women who must travel great distances for treatment, said she would consider the shorter treatment in such situations. ''This is very exciting news for our patients,'' because many women around the country live in rural areas or are elderly and must have someone drive them to get care, she said. Shorter treatment had another benefit: less swelling or shrinkage of breast tissue and less enlargement of blood vessels as a side effect of radiation. Other news at the conference: -The median survival of black women with advanced breast cancer lags that of their white counterparts - 17 months versus 27 months - an analysis of federal statistics from 1999 to 2003 finds. It is unclear, however, whether the gap is due to true racial differences or to variations in treatment, which the statistics do not reflect. -MRI or magnetic resonance imaging scans detect 10 percent to 20 percent more pre-invasive breast cancers than standard mammograms, especially the type most likely to spread, a study of 6,000 women in Germany found. However, no information was available on how many false alarms MRIs gave - the biggest factor limiting their use now, besides higher cost and limited availability. -Many survivors of childhood cancers are not getting recommended follow up tests to watch for second cancers later in life, a survey of 8,500 cancer survivors found. Only one-fourth at risk of developing heart problems because of their cancer treatment were tested for this every year or two as doctors recommend, and only half of women at risk of breast cancer got annual mammograms. About 10 million Americans are cancer survivors, so the study ''tells us both about our success and some of our challenges for the future,'' said Dr. Nancy Davidson, a cancer specialist at Johns Hopkins University in Baltimore and president-elect of the oncology society. soon as they're published. Suspect arrested in fatal hit-and-run Cop mistakes daughter as intruder and shoots her Bee blamed for causing fatal bicycle crash Rare colorful lobster caught in Rhode Island Man expected to recover from train crash Colombia fights Bellevue diver over sunken treasure 5 Idahoans killed in Burbank crash Woman suffers serious head injuries in motorcycle crash Huge tree crashes down on emergency crew amid rescue Supreme Court reinstates death sentence in King County murder
http://www.komotv.com/news/health cancer patients get hope from kidney cancer drug For the first time, doctors say they have found a pill that improves survival for people with liver cancer, a notoriously hard to treat disease diagnosed in more than half a million people globally each year. Docs say rolling sneakers responsible for rash of injuries Trendy wheeled sneakers that let kids zip down sidewalks, across playgrounds and through mall crowds could also send them rolling into emergency rooms on a stretcher, say doctors who blame a rash of injuries on the international craze. Parents of TB patient say he would not have flown if he thought he was contagious The parents and in-laws of the man who set off an international health scare by flying to Europe and back for his wedding while infected with a drug-resistant strain of tuberculosis stressed that he would never have traveled if he thought he was contagious. Less radiation OK for breast cancer Radiation to the head limits lung cancer spread, boost survival, study finds Study: Ginseng, flaxseed may fight cancer, but shark cartilage worthless Cases of salmonella sickness linked to peanut butter top 600 Border worker disregarded TB warning TB on a plane? Such cases rare so far, but more likely in the future Quarantined TB patient is the son-in-law of a CDC microbiologist FDA nixes fast track for cancer vaccine Chemical that led to pet food recall used by U.S. company for animal feed Terminally ill woman to donate kidney on reality show CDC looking for 80 passengers, 27 crew from TB flights US on mad cow: Don't test all cattle New UN testing guidance aims to identify more people with HIV Health agency warns water-pipe smoking may pose same risk as cigarettes Advanced Medical says that contact lens solution recall not due to manufacturing problem Govt. quarantines man with dangerous case of TB New fitness vibration plates popular but may be risky, experts say Americans divided on whether doctors should help terminally ill patients die FDA says warning shouldn't interrupt MedImmune flu vaccine production Antibodies from bird flu survivors point to new therapy Poke holes in a lung? Research aims to ease breath-robbing disease As ultrasound machines shrink, patients worldwide reap the benefits Fitness boot camps hit the parks, offering workouts beyond the gym Army to teach soldiers combat lifesaving during basic training Triple amputee to graduate from UCLA medical school 6 medical workers convicted in HIV case in Libya found not guilty of defamation On eve of Kevorkian's release, only Oregon has assisted suicide law CDC: Brand of contact lens solution linked to rare eye infection FDA acts against unapproved long-acting cough and cold drugs Study: Type 1 diabetic kids who watched lots of TV had poor control of disease soon as they're published. Suspect arrested in fatal hit-and-run Cop mistakes daughter as intruder and shoots her Bee blamed for causing fatal bicycle crash Rare colorful lobster caught in Rhode Island Man expected to recover from train crash Colombia fights Bellevue diver over sunken treasure 5 Idahoans killed in Burbank crash Woman suffers serious head injuries in motorcycle crash Huge tree crashes down on emergency crew amid rescue Supreme Court reinstates death sentence in King County murder
http://www.komotv.com/news/health/7824922.html Parents of TB patient say he would not have flown if he thought he was contagious of TB patient say he would not have flown if he thought he was contagious Jun 4, 2007 at 9:10 AM PDT Jun 4, 2007 at 9:10 AM PDT ATLANTA (AP) - The parents and in-laws of the man who set off an international health scare by flying to Europe and back for his wedding while infected with a drug-resistant strain of tuberculosis stressed that he would never have traveled if he thought he was contagious. "We're in hell and we want to get out of hell," said the man's father, Ted Speaker. Speaker's parents and in-laws appeared in an interview that aired Monday on ABC's "Good Morning America." Speaker's parents denied that their son was reckless. "We are not people of reckless behavior, nor is Andrew," said Andrew's mother, Cheryl Speaker. If he thought he was contagious, she said: "He would have been the first one not to go." Ted Speaker said he taped a meeting in which a doctor says three times that his son was not contagious though the doctors preferred that he not fly. The elder Speaker said he will release the tape at some point. While many people were outraged by Speaker's actions, his father didn't seemed worried when asked about possibly being served with a lawsuit over the case. "If they want to serve me go ahead," Ted Speaker said. "I am not at fault. My son is not at fault." Speaker, 31, is now receiving treatment at a Denver hospital. Before leaving last month for Europe for his wedding and honeymoon, Speaker has said he was advised by Fulton County, Ga., health authorities that he was not contagious or a danger to anyone. Officials told him they would prefer he didn't fly, but no one ordered him not to, he said. Speaker was in Europe when he learned tests showed he had not just TB, but an extremely drug-resistant strain known as XDR. Despite warnings from federal health officials not to board another long flight, he flew home for treatment, fearing he wouldn't survive if he didn't reach the U.S., he said. The family said that a Centers for Disease Control and Prevention official told them the only way for him to get back to America from Italy would be to hire a private plane. But the parents said they are not rich and could not have easily afforded a private jet. "We work hard," said Betsy Cooksey, a school teacher and mother of Andrew Speaker's new bride, Sarah. "We're not in careers that are high paying." Speaker's father-in-law, Robert Cooksey, works for the CDC, where he specializes in tuberculosis and other bacteria. "It's the height of irony," he said of the situation. Robert Cooksey also reiterated that Andrew Speaker did not get the illness from him. Andrew Speaker was quarantined May 25, after his return from his honeymoon, in the first such action taken by the federal government since 1963. After being hospitalized in Atlanta, he was flown to Denver on Thursday for treatment at the National Jewish Medical and Research Center. Speaker was taking antibiotics to battle a tennis-ball-size infection in his lung. Doctors said his treatment could include surgery to remove the infected tissue if the drugs don't work. Tests so far indicate Speaker's risk of spreading the infection are low, doctors said. soon as they're published. Suspect arrested in fatal hit-and-run Cop mistakes daughter as intruder and shoots her Bee blamed for causing fatal bicycle crash Rare colorful lobster caught in Rhode Island Man expected to recover from train crash Colombia fights Bellevue diver over sunken treasure 5 Idahoans killed in Burbank crash Woman suffers serious head injuries in motorcycle crash Huge tree crashes down on emergency crew amid rescue Supreme Court reinstates death sentence in King County murder
